Privacy policy
General information
The application "Kitchen Stories" (hereinafter "App") and the “Kitchen Stories” Web Services (hereinafter “Services”) is provided by AJNS New Media GmbH, Storkower Str. 115, 10407 Berlin (hereinafter "We" or "Us"). Every time this App and/or Services are used, data about your mobile end device are automatically collected, processed, and used. Protection of your privacy when you use the App and/or Services is important to us. Therefore, we would like to inform you below which of your personal data will be collected when you use the App and/or Services and how these data are handled.
You can view this Data Privacy Declaration at any time on our website at
https://www.kitchenstories.com/en/privacy
This website uses SSL or TLS encryption for security reasons during the transmission of your personal data and other confidential content (e.g. orders or inquiries to the controller). You can recognize an encrypted connection by the character string https:// and the lock symbol in your browser line.
Your personal data will only be transmitted encrypted. In order to protect your personal data from unauthorized access, modification or distribution of data by unauthorized persons, we have also taken technical and organizational security measures according to the state of the art. We regularly review these security measures and, if necessary, adapt them to technological progress.
Logfiles
We process so-called access data (in particular your IP address) for statistical evaluations for the purpose of the operation, security and technical optimizations on our website. This enables us to present our content more effectively, and to detect potential errors. We collect access data when you call up our website and save it in a log file (so-called log file):
the operating system
the amount of data sent to us
the amount of data transmitted
Date and time of access to the app
We can not identify you based on those informations. Log data is regularly deleted (after 90 days at the latest). The legal basis for this data processing can be found in our legitimate interest, within the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
Application improvement
3.1 Crashlytics (Firebase)
In order to understand technical problems related to our mobile apps, we use Crashlytics. Crashlytics is an analytics service provided by Google, Inc. Crashlytics collects technical information about your device (such as operating system and model) and gives us immediate insight into which versions of our apps are being used. You can find more information in Crashlytics' terms of use:
https://firebase.google.com/terms/crashlytics
Crashlytics provides us with detailed technical information about crashes and other errors in our app. No personal data is transmitted. Only real-time crash reports are sent with exact details about code-fragments and device information, which should simplify maintenance and improve the resulting stability of the app. The legal basis for this data processing is your consent given to us (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR).
For more information, please refer to the Crashlytics data processing and security terms:
https://firebase.google.com/terms/crashlytics-app-distribution-data-processing-terms/
3.2  Firebase
To enable an analysis of our Android app, e.g. for performance monitoring and error logs, we use the service provider Firebase. Firebase is a Google subsidiary and is based in San Francisco (CA), USA. The purpose of using Firebase is to detect technical crashes and other errors in our app and to reduce the error rate. For this purpose, the user data is transferred to Firebase in an anonymous form.
The legal basis for this data processing is your consent given to us (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR).
Google is certified according to the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield and guarantees an adequate level of data protection in terms of the GDPR:
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active
You can find the corresponding data protection declaration at
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
3.3 Sentry
We use the Sentry service of Functional Software Inc. 132 Hawthorne Street, San Francisco, California 94107 to improve the technical stability of our service by monitoring system stability and detecting code errors. Sentry serves these purposes alone and does not evaluate data for promotional purposes. User data, such as information about the device or time of error, is collected anonymously and is not used in a personalized manner.
The legal basis for this data processing is your consent given to us (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR).
Functional Software Inc is certified according to the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield and guarantees an adequate level of data protection in the sense of the GDPR:
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt0000000TNDzAAO&status=Active
You can find the corresponding data protection declaration at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
Registration
You have to register in order to use all the benefits of the App and/or the Service. To do so, you have to set up a user account with us and use it to log in. For this purpose, you have to enter your user name and e-mail address, as well as a password. These data are needed to set up a user account for you and to manage it, and also so that you can use the full version of the Application. We need these and potentially other data also to be able to respond to your wishes, questions, and complaints as well as to send you, after registration via email basic user account functions, our offers, and new content.
4.1  Facebook-Connect
Alternatively you can log in using your Facebook account. Your Facebook user account will then be linked to a new record in our user database. If you log in using Facebook Connect, we receive information about the basic user data saved in your Facebook user account. These are data that are publicly visible in the social network www.facebook.com. We only use your e-mail address, user name, and profile picture to set up a user account for you. In the settings of our applications you can delete your profile picture again which has been imported from Facebook. In addition to this, you can configure within your Facebook settings, which data shall be transferred to us.
In the case of Facebook Connect, data could be transferred from our services to your Facebook profile as well. The transferred data are stored and processed by us for registration on our service. If you register using Facebook Connect, you agree to the transfer of the basic user data in your Facebook profile to us and, vice versa, the transfer of data for use from the App to Facebook.
For more information about Facebook Connect and its privacy settings, please have look at its data privacy declaration
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
as well as its terms of service
https://www.facebook.com/policies
.
4.2 Google Sign-in
In our Android application and on our website you also have the possibility to sign in via your Google account. Doing so will link your Google account to a new record in our user database.
If you log in using Google Sign-In, we receive information about the basic user data saved in your Google user account. We only use your e-mail address, user name, and profile picture to set up a user account for you. In the settings of our applications you can delete your profile picture again which has been imported from Google. In addition to this, you can configure within your Google account settings, which data shall be transferred to us.
In the case of Google Sign-In, data could be transferred from our services to your Google profile as well. The transferred data are stored and processed by us for registration on our service. If you register using Google Sign-In, you agree to the transfer of the basic user data in your Google profile to us and, vice versa, the transfer of data for from us to Google.
For more information about Google Sign-In and its privacy settings, please have look at its data privacy declaration
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en-GB
as well as its terms of service
https://policies.google.com/terms?hl=en-GB
.
4.3 Personalizing your profile
In addition, the App gives you the option to personalize your profile. You can set information such a user name and a profile picture. The usage of a profile picture is optional and not needed to register for our services.
4.4 Interaktive Bereiche
The App has interactive areas where you publish pictures and comments. If you publish such information, you have to be aware that these areas are accessible by all users of our services. Your profile picture and user name will also be always be shown next to your submitted content. We cannot control how other users of the App use this information.
The content provided in the interactive areas could be saved for an unlimited time. If you would like to remove this content at any time, send us an e-mail to hello@kitchenstories.de.
4.5 Authorizations to access functions and data when using the services
Rights of access to functions and data on the mobile device In order for you to be able to use all the functions of the App, the Services, and the community you may have to grant the App the rights of access to the functions and data of your mobile device. In detail, access to the camera and the gallery is needed to upload profile pictures and pictures of dishes.
Even if your device does not give you the option of actively setting or rejecting these rights, you can prevent the access to some data by not using the corresponding functions of the App. We will use the granted rights exclusively for the purposes specified above, even if a granted right (e.g. for technical reasons) theoretically opens up other possibilities of use.
You can revoke a granted right at any time in the settings of your device (but this depends on your device and operating system, which we have no control over). Naturally, it is up to you to decide which data you would like to provide to us. In addition, we are bound by the principles of data minimization. If you do not provide certain information to us, this may result in that you are unable to use the full App and Services.
Cookies
Cookie Settings
Statistical analysis - Tracking
We use tracking technologies on our website to measure, evaluate and optimise our content. We can also identify security risks in order to protect our users and partners from fraud. The legal basis for this data processing is the consent you have given us (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR). For this purpose we use the following products, which are made available to us via external service providers:
6.1 Amplitude
We use Amplitude, an analysis service provided by Amplitude Inc, 501 2nd Street, Suite 100 San Francisco, CA 94107, USA, to better understand and optimize the behavior of our services.
Amplitude collects technical information such as the type of device (e.g. iPhone 6), the operating system used (e.g. iOS 8.4), the name of the provider (e.g. Vodafone), as well as events that occur in the app, for example  the use of individual functions such as our cookbook, the calling up of recipes, or the usage time.
Amplitude enables us to analyse the usage of the app by its users. The information generated by Amplitude is transmitted to a server of Amplitude Inc. in the USA and stored there. Amplitude Inc. is certified under the US-EU Privacy Shield Agreement. For more information about Amplitude's data processing, please visit
https://amplitude.com/privacy
.
The storage of cookies is based on Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent under the following link:
Cookie settings
6.2 Facebook Analytics
We use Facebook Analytics, this is an offer from Facebook Ireland Ltd ("Facebook"), 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland. In addition to technical information about your device, Facebook Analytics primarily collects information that is generated in the course of your use of Facebook. This concerns your own activities as well as those of people in your network. Facebook Analytics provides us with this data in aggregated form, enabling us to draw conclusions about the demographic characteristics of our users (such as age, gender and place of residence).
The storage of cookies is based on Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent under the following link:
Cookie settings
You can find more information on data processing by Facebook here:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
.
Information about how to contact Facebook, how to set up advertisements and the data use policy is available at
http://de-de.facebook.com/about/privacy
.
6.3 Facebook Lookalike Audiences
As part of usage-based or targeted online advertising, the product Facebook Lookalike Audiences (Facebook Inc. 1601 WILLOW ROAD MENLO PARK, CA 94025, USA) is also used on the website.
By using Facebook Lookalike Audience, the existing customer base can be expanded and the target group extended to all Facebook users who have similar characteristics to the user. The data will be processed in the USA. Facebook Inc. will be certified according to the EU-US Privacy Shield regulation. A Facebook cookie is also set by Facebook Lookalike Audience. We use Facebook Pixel to collect information about your activities on the website and behavioral data.
As a legal basis for processing, we refer to the consent you have given us for the use and disclosure of data to Facebook, according to Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.
Further information about the purpose and scope of data collection, further processing and use of the data, and privacy settings can be found in the Facebook privacy policy.
Cookie settings
6.4  Google Analytics
We use Google Analytics, a web analysis service by Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4 Ireland ("Google").
The protection of your data is important to us, therefore we have configured it to use the configuration parameter "anonymizeIp".
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/2763052
to shorten your IP address and process your personal usage data anonymously. All other data will only be processed pseudonymised. It is not possible for us to draw any conclusions about your identity.
Your data will furthermore be processed pseudonymously, as explained below. It is not possible for us to draw conclusions about your person. Google will use this information to evaluate your use of our online offer, to compile reports on the activities within this offer and to provide us with further services associated with this online offer and internet use. The processed data can be used to create pseudonymous user profiles of the users.
The IP address transmitted by the user's browser is not merged with other data from Google. Users can prevent the storage of cookies by adjusting their browser software accordingly; or prevent the collection of data generated by the cookie and related to their use of the online offer to Google and the processing of this data by Google by downloading and installing the browser plug-in available under the following link:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
The information generated by the cookie about your use of the website is usually transferred and stored to a Google server in the USA. Google is certified under the Privacy Shield Agreement and thus offers guarantees complying with the European data protection laws:
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active
.
The storage of cookies is based on Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time using the following link:
Cookie settings
Further information on the use of your data and objection options can be found in Google‘s privacy policy (
https://policies.google.com/technologies/ads
) and in the settings for the display of advertising by Google (
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
)
Further information on the terms of use of Google Analytics and the data protection regulations can be found at:
http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html
or at
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/
6.5 Google AdSense
We use Google AdSense, a service for integrating advertisements. The provider is Google Ireland Limited ("Google"), Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google AdSense uses "cookies", which are text files placed on your computer, to help the website analyze how users use the site. Google AdSense also uses so-called web beacons (invisible graphics). Through these web beacons information such as visitor traffic on these pages can be evaluated. This allows us to display individualized advertising.
The information generated by cookies and web beacons about the use of this website (including your IP address) and the delivery of advertising formats is transferred to a Google server in the USA and stored there. This information may be passed on by Google to contractual partners of Google. However, Google will not merge your IP address with other data stored by you.
The storage of cookies is based on Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent under the following link:
Cookie settings
Further information on data use by Google, setting and objection options, you can find out in the privacy policy of Google (
https://policies.google.com/technologies/ads
) and in the settings for the display of advertising by Google (
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
).
6.6 Google Ad Manager
We use the remarketing technology of Google Inc. (1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; "Google"). This technology enables us to reach users who have already visited our website by targeted advertising on the pages of the Google Partner Network. The display of the advertising is achieved through the use of cookies. Cookies can be used to analyze user behavior when visiting the website, targeted product recommendations, and interest-based advertising. These cookies are not used for personal identification and lose their validity after 30 days.
The legal basis for the use of the service is Art. 6 I f GDPR - legitimate interest. Our legitimate interest in the use of this service is to optimize the operation of our website and to increase your user experience and the general increase in sales of our service. Google is EU-US Privacy Shield, as well as Swiss-US Privacy Shield certified, which protects data transfer outside the European Economic Area.
You can find further information on Google's privacy policy at:
https://www.google.de/policies/privacy/
If you want to stop this tracking, you can use the following link:
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated#display_optout
Social media
We use present on social medias in order to communicate with our users and to provide informations about our services. By visiting our site, however, no direct connection is made between your browser and the servers of the respective social networks. The data will only be forwarded if you have choosen and agreed to the data transfer within the privacy settings. An automatic transmission of user data to the operators of these platforms does not take place.
For a detailed informations on the respective forms of processing and the possibilities of objection, we refer to the data protection declarations and information of the operators of the respective networks.
7.1 LinkedIn
We use the "share function" of the LinkedIn network (provided by LinkedIn Corporation, 2029 Stierlin Court, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA). By clicking on the LinkedIn "button", you will be redirected to your user account in a separate browser window - provided you are logged in to xing in your user account. The plug-in establishes a direct connection between your browser and the LinkedIn server. LinkedIn thereby receives information on your visit and your IP address. LinkedIn might track your visit to our website and link it to your account. We have no knowledge of the content of the (personal) data transmitted or used by LinkedIn. For more information, please see the LinkedIn privacy policy at:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
7.2  Xing
We use the "share function" of the network Xing (provided by Xing AG, Dammtorstraße 29-32, 20354 Hamburg, Germany). By clicking on the Xing "button", you will be redirected to your user account in a separate browser window, provided you are logged in to your user account at xing. The plug-in establishes a direct connection between your browser and the Xing server, sending information on your visit of our website and your IP address. We would like to point out that we have no knowledge of the content or use of the transmitted (personal) data by XING. For further information, please refer to the Xing privacy policy at:
https://www.xing.com/app/share?op=data_protection
.
7.3 Facebook (Fanpage)
We operate a so-called "fanpage" on Facebook (provided by from Facebook Ireland Ltd ("Facebook"), 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland) to provide information on topics relating to everyday work, employees and career opportunities at KitcheStories. We have agreed to the conditions for the commercial use of Facebook. When you visit our site, no Facebook data is initially requested for the display of Facebook teasers and no cookies are set.
The Facebook teasers are teasers with an image, text and external link to Facebook. This data is entered into the content management system in a separate automatic process (x times a day), so that no user interaction takes place at that moment. Your data can therefore not be stored by Facebook.
However, if you give your consent, Facebook uses a fan page cookie on your end device and collects so-called "insight data" about the use of our fan page:
Information about your visit to our Facebook fan page (your IP address, last visited website, file name, URL)
Information about your Facebook interactions regarding our content ("likes")
If necessary, your comments will be saved, including a timestamp
These cookies from Facebook each have a unique cookie ID. On the basis of the data processing carried out by Facebook, we receive anonymised statistical data of fan page visitors from Facebook in accordance with our joint responsibility as controllers pursuant to Art. 26 GDPR. At no time during your visit to our fanpage, the Insights function and the statistics provided by these will allow us to identify your person.
The legal basis for the collection and processing of your personal data carried out by Facebook for us for the aforementioned statistical purposes is Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a) GDPR.
When and in what form Facebook corrects, ports, saves or deletes your personal data is known only to Facebook. We have no influence on this. Since Facebook, as the provider of the fan page and the Facebook Insights Tool, carries out the surveys and evaluations of personal data required for our statistics, it also has the possibility to establish a personal reference using this data or transfer it to the USA. However, Facebook has submitted to the EU-US Privacy Shield.
Further information can be found at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/EU-US-Framework
.
7.4 YouTube
We also use the video portal of YouTube LLC, 901 Cherry Ave., 94066 San Bruno, CA, USA, hereinafter only referred to as "YouTube".
YouTube is a subsidiary of Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, hereinafter only referred to as "Google". Through certification under the EU-US Privacy Shield
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active
, Google, and thus its subsidiary YouTube, guarantees that the data protection requirements of the EU are also complied with when processing data in the USA.
We use YouTube in conjunction with the Advanced Privacy Mode feature to show you videos. The legal basis is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
According to YouTube, the function "Extended Privacy Mode" has the effect that the data described in more detail below is only transmitted to the YouTube server when you actually start a video.
Without this "Extended Privacy Mode", a connection to the YouTube server in the USA is established when you visit one of our Internet pages on which a YouTube video is embedded. This connection is required in order to display the besaid video via your internet browser. YouTube will at least record and process your IP address, the date and time, and the website you visited in this process.
For the purpose of functionality as well as for the analysis of usage behaviour, YouTube permanently stores cookies via your internet browser on your device. If you do not agree with this processing, you have the possibility to prevent its storage within your browser settings.
You will find more informations above under "Cookies". Google provides further information about the collection and use of data as well as your rights and protection options at
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
7.5 Vimeo
We use plugins from the video portal Vimeo, provided by Vimeo Inc, 555 West 18th Street, New York, New York 10011, USA. When you visit our website, a connection to the Vimeo servers is established.
This page uses the two-click solution for this, ensuring a direct contact between Vimeos Servers in the US and our users only when you actually start a video. This tool prevents an automatical transfer of your data to this platform.
Without this "two-click solution", a connection to Vimeo's server in the USA is established as soon as you visit one of our Internet sites where a Vimeo video is embedded. This connection is required to view the video on our site using your internet browser. In the course of this process, Vimeo will record and process at least your IP address, the date and time, and the internet page you visited.
If you are logged in to your Vimeo account, you allow Vimeo to assign data on your visit directly to your personal profile. You can prevent this by logging out of your Vimeo account. For more information about how Vimeo handles user data, please see the Vimeo privacy policy at
https://vimeo.com/privacy
.
Newsletter
On our website you can subscribe to our newsletter to receive information. We will only process the information you provide voluntarily for the purpose of sending you the newsletter. Our legal basis for the processing is your consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time with effect for the future.
8.1 Mailchimp
The newsletters are sent via "MailChimp", a newsletter dispatch platform of the US provider Rocket Science Group, LLC, 675 Ponce De Leon Ave NE #5000, Atlanta, GA 30308, USA. The e-mail addresses of our newsletter recipients, as well as their other data described in this notice, are stored on the servers of MailChimp in the USA. MailChimp uses this information to send and evaluate the newsletter on our behalf.
Furthermore MailChimp may use this data according to its own information to optimize or improve its own services, e.g. for technical optimization of sending and presentation of the newsletters or for economic purposes to determine from which countries the recipients come.
However, MailChimp does not use the data to write to them itself or pass them on to third parties. We trust in the reliability and the IT and data security of MailChimp.
MailChimp is certified under the US-EU data protection agreement "Privacy Shield" and is committed to comply with the EU data protection regulations:
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt0000000TO6hAAG
Furthermore, we have concluded a "data processing agreement" with MailChimp. This is a contract, in which MailChimp commits itself to protect the data of our users, to process it according to its data protection regulations on our behalf and especially not to pass it on to third parties. The privacy policy of MailChimp can be viewed here.
Further information about the handling of user data can be found in the privacy policy of Mailchimp at:
https://mailchimp.com/legal/
Your rights as a data subject
With regard to the data processing listed here, you are entitled to various data subject rights which are regulated in the GDPR.
9.1 Right of access
First of all, you have the right to obtain information about the data that you have transmitted to us and that we have processed (Art. 15 GDPR).
9.2 Right of rectification, erasure and limitation
You can also request the correction (Art. 16 GDPR), deletion (Art. 17 GDPR) and restriction (Art. 18 GDPR) of your data.
9.3 Right to data portability and right to object
You also have a right to data portability (Art. 20 GDPR) and a right of objection (Art. 21 GDPR).
9.4 Right to lodge a compliant with a supervisory authority
Without prejudice to any other administrative or judicial remedy, you also have the right to complain to a data protection supervisory authority. You may contact the data protection authority at your usual place of residence or our registered office. The address of the supervisory authority responsible for us is
Berliner Beauftragte für Datenschutz und Informationsfreiheit
Friedrichstr. 219
10969 Berlin
Telefon: 030 13889-0
E-Mail:
mailbox@datenschutz-berlin.de
Advertisement
highfivve GmbH
We use cookies from highfivve GmbH, Erika-Mann-Strasse 23, 80636 Munich, on our website. On the basis of corresponding contracts, highfivve GmbH enables third companies to set their own cookies on websites that are in the marketing portfolio of highfivve GmbH, or provides third parties with data collected by means of cookies.
Cookies always transmit only pseudonymous data. Personal identification is not possible through a cookie. The cookie does not know which user is currently accessing the browser.
Users can influence the use of cookies. Most browsers have an option to restrict or completely prevent the storage of cookies. A user does not receive less advertising as a result, but the advertising displayed is only less relevant to him or her. For each cookie used, highfivve GmbH also provides detailed information on the general purpose of the cookie, the provider and the opt-out options via a software tool. highfivve also enables the user to block or delete individual cookies. You can find more information here . The following types of cookies are used via our partner highfivve GmbH:
Cookies for campaign validation
These are cookies that are used to check whether an advertising campaign has been carried out by highfivve GmbH for an advertising customer in accordance with the order. These include cookies from highfivve GmbH and highfivve GmbH’s partners that determine whether an advertising banner was placed on a website at the agreed frequency. This serves to comply with and verify the specifications agreed with a customer for the implementation of advertising campaigns (e.g. time period, area, avoidance of multiple sending of the same advertising medium to a user).
Cookies to achieve greater targeting accuracy
Cookies from highfivve GmbH are matched with cookies from other service providers in order to increase the probability of a hit in a specific segment (e.g. interest). highfivve GmbH uses the following cookies for such matching: cookies that are set by service providers on behalf of highfivve GmbH in order to analyse tracking behaviour (pages accessed by a user); cookies that highfivve GmbH receives from third parties in order to match them with its own segmentations; cookies that partners of highfivve GmbH set in order to achieve greater targeting accuracy and match them with their own cookie data.
You have the option of prohibiting the use of cookies at
https://www.kitchenstories.com/en/#cmpscreen
. Further data protection information from highfivve GmbH can be found at
https://highfivve.com/transparenz/
Information about the controller / data protection officer
If you have any further questions, e.g. about data that we have stored about you, please do not hesitate to contact us
AJNS New Media GmbH
Storkower Str. 115
10407 Berlin
Phone:
AJNS New Media GmbH is the responsible party in terms of data protection regulations. Contact requests can be made via e-mail to
hello@kitchenstories.de
.
Our data protection officer is Mr Ali Tschakari, LL.M. Bitkom Servicegesellschaft mbH, Albrechtstraße 10, 10117 Berlin. You can contact him directly via e-mail at
datenschutz@bitkom-consult.de
.
Concluding provisions
AJNS New Media GmbH has the right to amend this Privacy Policy at any time to ensure its compliance with current legal requirements, or to implement changes to the services in the Privacy Policy, for example, when new services are introduced or changes are made to the website. The new Privacy Policy will then apply when you return to this website.
Status: November 2020
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.privacyshield.gov/participant?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active:
Skip to content
Google LLC
Active Participant
Other Covered Entities
Industries
Participation
Privacy Policy
Dispute Resolution
Other Covered Entities
See Purposes of Data Collection section for details on scope of cert
Industries
Information and Communications Technology
Information Technology Services
Participation
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Framework:
Active
Original Certification Date:  9/14/2023
Next Certification Due Date: 9/13/2024
Data Collected: HR, NON-HR
Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Framework:
Active
Original Certification Date:  4/18/2017
Next Certification Due Date: 9/13/2024
Data Collected: HR, NON-HR
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Framework:
Active
Original Certification Date:  9/22/2016
Next Certification Due Date: 9/13/2024
Data Collected: HR, NON-HR
Purpose of Data Collection
This certification applies to Google LLC and its wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries, including X (a division of Google LLC) and Chronicle LLC, and any other wholly-owned U.S. subsidiary of Google LLC to the extent of any current separate self-certification by such entity.  With respect to personal data other than human resources data: Data is processed for various purposes depending on the particular product or service being provided, including: sales and marketing to consumers and businesses; supplying services and products to consumers and businesses; operating, developing and improving services and products of Google and/or any of its wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries identified below; personalizing services and products; financial processing and management; supplier, vendor and partner relationship management; fraud prevention, security, and protection of Google, its wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries, and our users; compliance with applicable law and governmental, legislative and regulatory bodies; and customer support and relationship management. Data is disclosed to third parties as detailed in our relevant Privacy Policies, listed below, including: in situations in which we have consent, for external processing, with domain administrators, and for legal reasons. With respect to human resources data: Data is processed for various employment and legal purposes, including: recruitment and staffing; compensation, benefit programs and payroll; performance management and training; compliance and risk management; workplace management; protection against injury, theft, legal liability, fraud and abuse; and other business purposes. Data is disclosed to third parties as detailed in our relevant Privacy Policies, listed below, including for business-related and legal purposes.

We currently do not rely on the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks and the UK Extension to transfer Swiss and UK personal information to the U.S..
Privacy Policy
HR Data
Google Employee Privacy Policy
Description:
Describes how Google collects and uses employee data. Available to employees on Google internal sites and services. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for Google Employee Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
HR and Non-HR Data
Document:
Actifio Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) will serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
BreezoMeter
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) will serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 10/1/2023
Document:
Dataform Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) will serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/11/2023
Document:
Elastifile Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Extended Workforce Privacy Privacy Policy
Description:
The Extended Workforce Privacy Policy explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Fitbit Privacy Policy
Description:
The Fitbit Privacy Policy describes the privacy practices for our devices, applications, software, websites, APIs, products, and services. The Privacy Policy covers the data we collect, how we use it, the controls we offer, and security measures we take.
Effective Date: 6/6/2023
Document:
Google Careers Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 8/31/2023
Document:
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy notice.
Effective Date: 8/21/2023
Document:
Google Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 7/1/2023
Document:
Google Registry Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this Privacy Policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Kaggle Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/15/2023
Document:
Looker Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/20/2023
Document:
Privacy Policy for Nest Websites
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Privacy Statement for Nest's Products and Services
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy statement.
Effective Date: 9/1/2023
Document:
Qwiklabs Privacy Policy
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/14/2023
Document:
SecOps Privacy Notice
Description:
Explains the data that we collect and why we collect it, how we use that data, and the choices we offer to control that data. The EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs) serve as the dispute resolution provider for this privacy policy.
Effective Date: 9/7/2023
Verification Method
Self-Assessment
Dispute Resolution
Questions or Complaints?
If you have a question or complaint regarding the covered data, please contact Google LLC at:
Keith Enright
Chief Privacy Officer
Google LLC
Google Data Protection Office
1600 Amphitheatre Pkwy
Mountain View, California  94043-1351
dpf-core-team@google.com
Phone:
(650) 253-0000
Fax: 650.618.1806
Privacy Shield organizations must respond within 45 days of receiving a complaint.
If you have not received a timely or satisfactory response from Google LLC to your question or complaint, please contact the independent recourse mechanism listed below
HR RECOURSE MECHANISM
EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs)
UK Information Commissioner's Office (ICO)
NON-HR RECOURSE MECHANISM
EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs)
Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC)
UK Information Commissioner's Office (ICO)
Appropriate statutory body with jurisdiction to investigate any claims against Google LLC regarding possible unfair or deceptive practices and violations of laws or regulations covering privacy
Federal Trade Commission
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Hauptmenü
Google-Apps
Sub-policy 2
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024 |
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 3
https://amplitude.com/privacy:
Privacy Notice
Table of Contents
1. Introduction
2. What This Privacy Notice Covers
3. Personal Data We Collect And How We Use The Personal Data
4. When Amplitude Discloses Personal Data
5. Customer End User Data
6. International Transfer
7. Our Commitment To Data Security
8. Your Choices About How We Use And Disclose Information We Collect From You
9. Other Information About Our Privacy Practices
10. Updates And Changes To The Privacy Notice
11. Disputes
12. California Privacy Rights
13. Contact Us
14. Cookies
15. Previous Privacy Version
Last Updated: September 26, 2023
1. Introduction
Amplitude, Inc. ("
Amplitude
," "
we
," or "
us
") is a cloud-based product-analytics platform that helps customers build better products. Amplitude respects the privacy of individuals and is committed to protecting the information of visitors to the website ("
Visitors
") and individuals or entities that register to use the Amplitude products and services ("
Customers
"). This Privacy Notice describes Amplitude’s practices for collecting, storing, using, disclosing, and otherwise processing information in relation to Visitors of the website, amplitude.com, including our Community Forum and Amplitude Academy ("
Website
"), Amplitude’s marketing activities, and Customers accessing and using our products and services (collectively, "
Product
").
Please read the following carefully to understand our policies and practices regarding your information collected through the Website, through your use of the Product, and through our marketing activities. If you do not agree with the below policies and practices, your choice is not to use our Website or register to use our Product, or to unsubscribe from our marketing.
2. What This Privacy Notice Covers
This Privacy Notice covers how we treat Personal Data that we gather about you in the course of our business, including when you access or use our Website or Product and through our or our partner’s events and marketing activities. Specifically, Amplitude is the controller of your Personal Data as described in this Privacy Notice, when it collects personal information from: (i) Visitors to Amplitude’s publicly available Website; (ii) Customers and their employees or other authorized users of their Amplitude instance when registering to use and using the Product; and (iii) when we receive personal information from or about you through our sales and marketing activities or events.
Throughout this Privacy Notice, "Personal Data" means any information that identifies or relates to a particular individual and also includes information referred to as "personally identifiable information" or "personal information" under applicable data privacy laws, rules or regulations.
For clarity, this Privacy Notice does not apply to Customer End User Data (as defined below) submitted by our customers to the Product. In those circumstances, Amplitude is processing Customer End User Data on behalf of that customer and that customer is responsible for the collection and use of your data. In addition, this Privacy Notice does not apply to the mobile applications, websites or services offered by our Customers or other third-parties. You should refer to that customer’s or third party’s privacy notice and direct any inquiries to them.
3. Personal Data We Collect And How We Use The Personal Data
3.1
PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT
The Personal Data you provide to us directly
You provide your Personal Data to us when you voluntarily fill in forms on our Website such as when you request a demo or to contact sales. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number and the content of your request.
You may also share Personal Data with us through our Website when you register for an event or online webinar or training; sign up to receive our newsletter; subscribe to our blog; register to contribute and participate in our Community Forum or use Amplitude Academy; download a white paper or playbook; or complete a survey. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number and the content of your request.
In order to access and use the Product, you are required to register for an account with us. When you register for an account, you may provide Personal Data to us, including first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number, and username and password.
You may also provide Amplitude with your personal information at a marketing event or through marketing activities. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, work address, phone number and the content of your request.
If you attend an in-person or virtual event or agree to be recorded in a telephone or video meeting, we may record some or all of that event or meeting. For events, we may also document the event by taking photos or interviewing you at the event. We use this information for business and marketing purposes and training purposes.
You may choose to participate in an Amplitude program that allows you to pay fees with a credit or debit card, in which case you may provide your credit card or other payment details information directly to our third party payment processor. As explained below, Amplitude does not store this information.
The Personal Data we collect from third party sources
Amplitude may obtain Personal Data about you from third parties, including, but not limited to, marketing event organizers, partners, resellers, and public databases and websites.
Service providers
. For example, we may use third party providers of business contact information. The Personal Data provided to Amplitude by these Service providers about you may include your first and last name, company name, job title, business mailing addresses, business email addresses and business phone numbers, and LinkedIn URLs for purposes of delivering relevant Product updates and information, email content, advertisements and events.
Advertising partners.
We receive information about you from some of our service providers who assist us with marketing or promotional services, related to how you interact with our Website, event promotions, advertisements or communications. Amplitude requires that any third party providing us with Personal Data contact information has obtained the information lawfully and has the appropriate consent to share the information with Amplitude.
Google’s API Services.
Amplitude integrates Google’s Application Programming Interface (API) Services to allow users the option of logging into our platform with their Google credentials. If you choose to login to the Amplitude platform with Google’s API services, Google may share with us your email, name, and your unique Google ID so we can identify and authenticate you as a user. We do not share your data with any other parties, other than as may be necessary to provide our services to you. Amplitude’s use of information received from Google’s APIs will adhere to the
Google API Services User Data Policy
.
Targeted Online Advertisements:
We use third party service providers to help us understand our marketing efforts and to reach potential customers across the web. These third parties may use targeting and advertising cookies to track your online activity and across different channels, including our websites, email, and other websites and applications, to understand your interests, to display an advertisement for Amplitude, or email you with a marketing communication for Amplitude.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to, and we are not responsible for, cookies in third party ads. You should check the privacy policies of advertisers and/or ad services to learn more about their use of cookies and your information.
Information We Collect Automatically:
As you navigate through and interact with our Website or Product, we may use cookies, which are small files placed on your computer or mobile device, and web beacons, which are small electronic files located on pages of the Website or in email communications, to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions and events, and patterns. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them
here
.
We also use cookies to access information when you sign in, store your preferences, interact with certain functionality in the Product, to keep you logged in, and to store a limited amount of behavioral data.
The data automatically collected from cookies and web beacons may include information from your Web browser (such as browser type and browser language) and details of your visits to our Website, including traffic data, logs about your login history, identity confirmation, page views, length of visit and website navigation paths as well as information about your computer and internet connection, including your IP address and connecting software. We collect this data in order to help us provide, support and improve our Website, the Product and the user experience with our Website and Product, and for network and information security purposes. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them
here
.
Additionally, Amplitude may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about our Customers' interactions with the Product in a manner that allows us to reproduce and fix issues and to identify areas of improvement for our Product. Customers can opt out of the use of this software during their use of the Product by contacting us at privacy@amplitude.com.
The information we collect automatically may also include statistical and performance information arising from our Customers’ use of our Product and Visitors to our Website. This type of data will only be used by us in an aggregated and anonymized manner.
3.2
THE WAY AMPLITUDE USES YOUR PERSONAL DATA
We use Personal Data that we collect about you or that you provide to us as is necessary to run our business and to carry out day-to-day business activities. How we use the Personal Data we collect depends in part on how you choose to communicate with us, how you use our Website and/or Product and interact with us, and any preferences you have communicated to us. In general, we use the Personal Data in order to respond to a request from you, to carry out our legal obligations, to fulfill a contract with you, to provide the Product or other services to you, to make improvements to the Product, to protect your vital interests, to provide you with notices and for other purposes with your consent as described below.
We use the Personal Data you provide to us when you fill in forms on our Website to respond to your request, provide requested information, and to contact you about that request. Our legal basis for processing this personal information is our legitimate interest in communicating with you and fulfilling your requests.
We may use your Personal Data to provide the Product to you, including to make improvements to the Product and understand your preferences to personalize your experience, as well as for non-marketing or administrative purposes (such as notifying you of major changes to the Website, the Product or for customer service purposes). Our legal basis for processing this Personal Data is in the performance of our contract to provide the Product or other services to you.
We also use the Personal Data you provide to us for the purpose of operating our Website and Product; to detect bugs, report errors and to maintain the quality and safety of our Website and Product; and for ensuring the security and integrity of our Website and Product. Our legal basis for processing this personal information is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of and security of our Website and Product.
For Personal Data that we collect through tracking technologies about your interaction with our Website and Product, we use this information for analyzing the use of the Website and Product in order to improve the quality and design, user experience, and performance of our Website and Product. Our legal basis for processing this type of data is our legitimate interests, namely, to provide you with a better user experience.
For Personal Data we collect through targeted or online advertising cookies, we use this information to display and measure engagement with advertisements across different devices and sites and to serve you with marketing materials.
We may use the Personal Data you provide to us at marketing events, when you register for an online webinar or download a whitepaper for the purpose of offering, marketing and selling products and services to you or to communicate with you about an event. Our legal basis for processing this Personal Data is consent, which you can withdraw at any time.
We may also use any of your Personal Data identified in this Privacy Notice for the purposes of: (i) enforcing our agreements and policies, including Terms of Service or Main Service Agreement, (ii) protecting or defending Amplitude’s legal rights; (iv) protecting your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person; or (v) complying with a legal obligation.
We may use your Personal Data for any other business purpose stated when collecting your Personal Data or as otherwise set forth in applicable data privacy laws.
We will not collect additional categories of Personal Data or use the Personal Data we collect for materially different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without providing you notice.
As noted in the list above, we may communicate with you if you’ve provided us the means to do so. For example, if you’ve given us your email address, we may send you promotional email offers or email you about your use of the Product or Website. Also, we may receive a confirmation when you open an email from us, which helps us improve our Website and Product. If you do not want to receive communications from us, you can unsubscribe from marketing communications or email us with your preferences at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com.
3.3 LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA FOR EEA, UK, AND SWISS VISITORS AND CUSTOMERS
If you are an individual in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), United Kingdom, Switzerland, or another relevant jurisdiction, we collect and process Personal Data about you only where we have a legal basis or bases for doing so under applicable laws. The legal bases depend on how you use the Website and/or Product, the Product your organization has purchased or uses, how you choose to interact and communicate with Amplitude’s Website and Product, and whether you attend Amplitude events. However, we will collect Personal Data only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you and we will endeavor to make that clear at collection.
4. When Amplitude Discloses Personal Data
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us as described below.
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us to our subsidiaries and affiliates.
We may share your Personal Data collected from you as described in this Privacy Notice with third-party service providers who need to access the Personal Data in order to perform services on behalf of Amplitude, such as processing or storing such information, securing our Website or Product, or providing analytics services on our behalf. The third-party service providers are limited to using the Personal Data solely to provide the services to us and are bound by contractual obligations to keep Personal Data confidential and secure and to use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them.
If you are part of an Amplitude program that allows you to pay fees with a credit card or debit card and you choose to pay such fees with a credit card or debit card, your credit card or debit card information is provided directly to our third-party payment processor, Stripe, to process the payments. The payment information is transmitted directly via an encrypted connection to Stripe. Stripe uses, processes and stores your Personal Data and payment information in accordance with Stripe’s privacy policy available at stripe.com/us/privacy. Amplitude does not collect or store your payment information. Stripe maintains that it is PCI compliant and you can learn more about Stripe’s security measures available at stripe.com/help/security.
We may share your Personal Data if we believe disclosure is necessary to comply with applicable laws, regulations, respond to a court order, subpoena or a government request (such as a search warrant). If a government request or other legal process requires Amplitude to disclose your personal data, then Amplitude will use reasonable efforts to provide you with prior notification of the disclosure unless Amplitude is prohibited by law from doing so.
Amplitude also reserves the right to disclose your Personal Data that Amplitude believes, in good faith, is appropriate or necessary to: (i) enforce our agreements and policies, including for billing and collection purposes, (ii) protect the security or integrity of the Website or Product; or (iii) protect or defend Amplitude’s legal rights.
In the event that Amplitude is acquired by or merged with a third party entity, we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign your Personal Data as part of such merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control. In the unlikely event of our bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, or assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the application of laws or equitable principles affecting creditors rights generally, we may not be able to control how your personal information is treated, transferred, or used.
Amplitude may disclose anonymized and/or aggregated information about Visitors to the Website or our Customers’ use of the Product that does not identify any individual.
Amplitude makes available our Community Forum and other resources or materials where you may post user generated content. The information you choose to post is publicly available and may be read and collected by others that visit these sections of the Website. Except for the details in your profile (e.g., username), the categories of data disclosed in these circumstances will depend on what information you choose to provide.
Amplitude may disclose Personal Data to third-party business partners at your direction, if you access or request contact from the third-party business partners through the Product or Website or at a marketing event.
Amplitude may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us for any purpose disclosed by us when we collect the information or with your consent, such as advertising or marketing providers.
5. Customer End User Data
This Privacy Notice does not apply to Customer End Users, Customer End User Data or Customer Applications.
With respect to the Personal Data collected by our Customers and submitted to the Amplitude platform, Amplitude is a processor and only processes such Personal Data in accordance with the instructions of our Customers. Our Customers may integrate into their mobile applications, websites or other services (collectively, "
Customer Applications
") certain aspects of our Product in order to understand how their own users ("
Customer End Users
") engage with the Customer Applications ("
Customer End User Data
").
Our Customers, not Amplitude, choose the type of Customer End User Data collected by Customer Applications, and submitted and processed through our Customers’ use of the Products. We process the Customer End User Data only according to the instructions of Customers and our legal obligations with respect to the Customer End User Data is set forth in the agreement between us and our Customers. The collection of Customer End User Data through Customer Applications is governed by our Customers’ privacy policies, and if you are a Customer End User then you should review the Customer’s privacy policy to learn more about the Customer’s data handling practices.
While Amplitude recognizes that an individual has the right to access, delete and amend the data collected about that individual, Amplitude only has a relationship with our Customers and does not interact with the Customer End Users. As such, if you are a Customer End User and you would like to access, amend or delete your data, you need to contact the Customer directly with your request which Customer may process. Amplitude will respond within a reasonable period of time to any such request or assistance requested by our Customer.
Amplitude only retains the Customer End User Data we process on behalf of our Customers for as long as necessary to provide the Product to our Customers or as required to comply with legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce any agreement.
6. International Transfer
By interacting with the Website or using the Product or otherwise providing information to Amplitude, you understand that your Personal Data may be transferred to the United States or another country other than your country of residence and you consent to such transfer. In order to ensure that your Personal Data receives an adequate level of protection and security, Amplitude has implemented appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of Personal Data, as required by applicable data protection laws. These safeguards may include using the European Commission-approved standard contractual clauses to protect the transfer of your Personal Data to Amplitude’s corporate affiliates or service providers, if required by applicable law.
Amplitude complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Amplitude has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Amplitude has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles (together, the “DPF Principles”), the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“DPF”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
For the actions of third party agents Amplitude engages to process data on our behalf, Amplitude remains responsible and liable under the DPF Principles if a third party agent processes the Personal Data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Amplitude proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
7. Our Commitment To Data Security
Amplitude uses commercially reasonable physical, managerial, and technical safeguards designed to secure your Personal Data from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure. These measures include, for example, physical access controls, encryption, firewalls, and detection and monitoring. Our personnel who may have access to your Personal Data are required to keep that information confidential and trained on their security and privacy obligations.
You, however, are also responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your password and other information used by you to access the Website or use the Product. While Amplitude does its best to protect your Personal Data, any transmission of your Personal Data is done at your own risk and Amplitude cannot guarantee that such Personal Data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Except as expressly required by law, we are not responsible for the theft, destruction, loss or inadvertent disclosure of your Personal Data or information. If Amplitude learns of a security systems breach, then we may attempt to notify you electronically so that you can take appropriate protective steps. Amplitude may post a notice on the Website or in Product if a security breach occurs. Depending on where you live, you may have a legal right to receive notice of a security breach in writing.
8. Your Choices About How We Use And Disclose Information We Collect From You
We strive to provide you with choices regarding your Personal Data and we understand that you have the right to access, correct, delete, object to and restrict our use of your Personal Data. We also understand that you have the right to obtain a copy of your Personal Data from us and to withdraw your consent to the processing of your Personal Data by us. Please note that the rights set forth in this Section 8, unless otherwise noted, apply globally to all Visitors and Customers, whether or not you are a California resident or a resident of the EEA, United Kingdom, or Switzerland. We have created mechanisms to provide you with the following control over your Personal Data:
You may choose not to provide Personal Data through our Website or when you register for the Product, in which case Amplitude may not be able to provide certain services to you or respond to your requests.
You can access, review, correct and/or change your Personal Data by logging into your account on the Website or Product and visiting your account profile page. You may also send us an email at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com to request access to, correct or delete any Personal Data that you have provided to us. In some cases, we may not be able to delete your Personal Data except by also deleting your user account.
If you do not wish to have your email address or other contact information used by us to promote our own products or services, you can opt-out by checking the relevant box located on the form on which we collect your Personal Data, by updating your user or subscription preferences in your account profile(s), or by sending us an email stating your request to privacy@amplitude.com. If we have sent you a promotional email, you may unsubscribe to receive future emails via the unsubscribe link in that email or adjust your user preferences in your account profile as noted above. The opt out specified above does not apply to information provided to us as a result of a purchase, product service experience or other transactions. You cannot unsubscribe from non-promotional and transactional communications.
You may also request a copy of your Personal Data that you have provided to us directly by sending an email to privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com. We will provide you a copy of your Personal Data in a commonly used electronic form.
If we collected and processed your Personal Data with your consent, where required by law, you can withdraw your consent at any time by emailing privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com.
Depending on your country or state of residence, including if you are a California resident, you have the right to opt out of the sale of Personal Data, certain sharing of Personal Data with third party ad partners, and the right to limit the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information. We do not sell your Personal Data or use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those permitted by the CCPA. We may share Personal Data with third party ad partners, such as through cookies or by providing lists of email addresses for potential customers so we can reach them across the web with relevant ads. If you wish to opt out of sharing, you may adjust your preferences in the Cookie Settings.
If you wish to opt out of this sharing of your Personal Data with cookies on this domain, please update your Cookie Settings.
Please note to exercise the rights set forth above we may ask you to: (1) provide sufficient information to allow us to verify that you are the person about whom we have collected Personal Data, and (2) describe the request in sufficient detail to allow us to understand, evaluate, and respond to it. Each request that meets both of these criteria will be considered a "Valid Request." We may not respond to requests that do not meet these criteria. We will only use Personal Data provided in a Valid Request to verify you and complete your request. You do not need an account to submit a Valid Request.
We will work to respond to your Valid Request within 30 days of receipt. We will not charge you a fee for making a Valid Request unless your Valid Request(s) is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that your Valid Request warrants a fee, we will notify you of the fee and explain that decision before completing your request.
You may submit a Valid Request, or appeal our response to a valid request, by emailing us at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com with the appropriate information and detail.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights under the GDPR, CCPA or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations. We will not deny you our goods or services, charge you different prices or rates, or provide you a lower quality of goods and services if you exercise your rights under the GDPR, CCPA or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations.
9. Other Information About Our Privacy Practices
9.1
Our Retention Practices
Personal Data that Amplitude collects and processes as a controller for the purposes identified in this Privacy Notice are not kept by Amplitude for longer than is necessary for the specific purpose identified in this Privacy Notice, unless required to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your Personal Data to comply with applicable laws or regulations), resolve disputes, and enforce our legal agreements and policies. When we no longer have a legitimate business need to retain your Personal Data, we will either delete or anonymize it.
9.2
Children’s Privacy
Amplitude’s Website and Product are not directed at children. We do not knowingly collect or solicit Personal Data directly from individuals that are under the age of 13. If you are under 13, please do not provide or send us any Personal Data or attempt to register for or otherwise use the Product. If we learn that a child under 13 has directly provided us with their Personal Data through the Website or Product, or that we have collected information for a child under 13 through our marketing activities, then we will delete that information. If you believe a child under 13 has registered for an account on the Website or Product, or is receiving marketing materials from Amplitude, please contact us at privacy@amplitude.com.
9.3
Automated Decision-Making
Amplitude does not use any Personal Data provided by you for the purpose of automated decision-making or profiling.
9.4
Other Websites; Links
Our Website, Product or marketing materials may contain links to other third party websites or applications (such as Facebook, LinkedIn or Twitter). This Privacy Notice does not apply to any third party websites, including through any application that may link to or be accessible from or on the Website or Product, and Amplitude is not responsible for the privacy policies and the content of the third party websites or applications.
10. Updates And Changes To The Privacy Notice
Please note that we reserve the right, at any time, to add to, change, update, or modify this Privacy Notice, to reflect changes in our practices, technologies, additional factors, and to be consistent with applicable data protection and privacy laws or other legal requirements. The modified Privacy Notice will be posted on this website along with the effective date. If, in our reasonable discretion, the changes are material, we will provide you with additional notice (such as adding a notice on our Website, in the Product, or sending you an email notification). Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective when they are posted on this page.
11. Disputes
As part of our commitment to the DPF Principles, if you are a resident of the European Union, UK, or Switzerland and you have a privacy or data use concern, please contact Amplitude directly at privacy@amplitude.com and Amplitude will use its best efforts to address your concern within 45 days of receipt of your complaint. For an unresolved privacy or data use concern that Amplitude has not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
.
For any DPF disputes that cannot be resolved by the methods above, you may be able to invoke a binding arbitration process under certain conditions. To find out more about the DPF's binding arbitration scheme, please see Annex I of the DPF Principles, here:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/Participation-Requirements-Data-Privacy-Framework-DPF-Principles-dpf
.
The Federal Trade Commission has investigation and enforcement authority over Amplitude’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF
12. California Privacy Rights
Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and its amendments (“CCPA”), California residents have certain rights to disclosures about how we collect, use, retain and disclose your Personal Data. This section addresses those requirements. For a description of all of our data collection, use and disclosure practices, please read this Privacy Notice in its entirety.
Personal Data Collection and Disclosure
Amplitude does not sell Personal Data as we understand the term “sell” to be defined by the CCPA. We share Personal Data, as we understand the term “share” to be defined by the CCPA, as set forth below.
The categories of Personal Data we may collect from you, from third parties, and from your interactions with us, and categories of third party recipients to whom we disclose such Personal Data for business purposes are set forth below. For additional detail about the Personal Data we collect and use and with whom we share this Personal Data and for what purpose, please review Sections 3 and 4 above.
Identifiers (such as name, email address, work address, and phone number)
Service providers; third parties
Commercial information (such as account records and transaction data)
Service providers; third parties
Internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or Website or Product usage)
Service providers
Geolocation data (such as country, city, or approximate location inferred from your IP address)
Service providers
Professional or employment-related data
Service providers; third parties
The following categories of Personal Data have been shared in the preceding 12 months with third party advertising partners and advertising technology providers so that we can reach you with advertisements for our products and services and make them more relevant to you:
Identifiers and contact information
Analytics or other electronic network activity.
Amplitude does not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those permitted purposes under the CCPA. Amplitude does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares Personal Data of individuals under the age of 16.
We retain Personal Data as described in Section 9.1 above.
California law gives California residents the right to make certain requests with regard to their Personal Data. Please see Section 8 for a description of your choices and how you may make a request.
13. Contact Us
If you have any comments, concerns or questions about this Privacy Notice or our privacy practices in general, please send an email to
privacy@amplitude.com
,
ccpa@amplitude.com
, or send mail to:
Amplitude, Inc.
Attn: Privacy
201 Third Street, Suite 200
San Francisco, CA 94103
EFFECTIVE DATE
This Privacy Notice was last updated on September 26, 2023.
14. Cookies
Amplitude uses cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns. Below we describe what cookies and web beacons are, why we use cookies and web beacons, the types of cookies and web beacons that we use, as well as what you can do in order to manage and delete cookies and web beacons.
What are cookies and web beacons?
Cookies are small text files that websites often store on computer hard drives or mobile devices of visitors to their websites. A cookie contains a unique number, which is used to recognize your computer or mobile device when you return to our Website. Cookies can remain on your computer or mobile device for different periods of time. The cookies can be either "persistent" cookies or "session" cookies. Persistent cookies are stored by a web browser and remain valid until a set expiration date. Session cookies only exist while your internet browser is open and are automatically deleted once you close your browser.
Web beacons (also referred to as clear gifs, pixel tags, and single-pixel gifs) are small electronic files contained on pages of websites that permit companies to count users who have visited certain webpages on a website and are used for other related website statistics (e.g., recording the popularity of certain website content and verifying system and server integrity).
What does Amplitude
use cookies and web beacons for?
Amplitude uses a variety of cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies for different purposes. Specifically, Amplitude uses cookies and web beacons to enhance the experience of our visitors to our Website (for example, by remembering your preferences and letting you navigate between pages efficiently) and to better understand how the Website and Product are used. Cookies may tell us, for example, whether you have visited the Website before or whether you are a new visitor.
What types of cookies and web beacons are used by Amplitude?
Amplitude uses both first-party and third-party cookies and web beacons. First-party cookies and web beacons are cookies and web beacons that are served directly by Amplitude to your computer or mobile device. Third-party cookies and web beacons are served by a third-party service provider on behalf of Amplitude. Third-party cookies are most commonly used for advertising and analytics purposes.
There are four categories of cookies and web beacons used by Amplitude. Specifically, Amplitude uses essential, performance, functionality and advertising cookies and web beacons.
Essential cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies are necessary for the operation of the Website and Product. These tracking technologies enable you to move around on the Website and use the Website’s features. You may not opt-out of these types of cookies because they are required to operate the Website and Product.
Performance cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies collect information about how you have used the Website and Product. We use performance cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to improve the user experience with our Website and Product.
Functionality cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies allow us to remember how you are logged into our Website, when you logged in or out and the actions you have taken while you have been logged into the Website.
Advertising cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies are used by our third-party service providers to deliver advertising to you on other third-party websites as well as help measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns. We also use these types of cookies to analyze Website visits and ad conversions from third-party websites.
The table below lists the types of cookies and third party service providers currently used by Amplitude but may not include all cookies or third party service providers. In addition, the below list of cookies and third party service providers is subject to change at any time.
Performance
Amplitude
We use our own products and services to analyze the user behavior within our website and our own products and services.
For more information about our privacy practices, see
https://amplitude.com/privacy
Performance
Google Analytics
We use Google Analytics to analyze the use of our website.
For more information about Google’s privacy practices, see
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Functional
Intercom
We use Intercom to power chat functionality.
For more information about Intercom’s privacy practices, see
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
Advertising
Marketo
We use Marketo for marketing automation services.
For more information about Marketo’s cookie policy, see
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/cookies/
Advertising
Doubleclick
We use Doubleclick to track advertisements and measure website visits and conversions.
For more information about opting out of the ads, see
https://adssettings.google.com/u/0/authenticated
Advertising
LinkedIn
We use LinkedIn to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on LinkedIn.
For more information about LinkedIn’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Advertising
Facebook
We use Facebook to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Facebook.
For more information about Facebook’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.facebook.com/help/www/213802165366955
Advertising
AddThis
We use AddThis for their website tools like social sharing buttons.
For more information about AddThis’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.oracle.com/legal/privacy/addthis-privacy-policy.html
Advertising
StackAdapt
We use StackAdapt to track advertisements and measure website visits and conversions.
For more information about StackAdapt’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.stackadapt.com/platform-and-services-privacy-policy
Advertising
Bing
We use Bing to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Bing.
For more information about Bing’s privacy practices, please see
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us/privacystatement
Advertising
Reddit
We use Reddit to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Reddit.
For more information about Reddit’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.reddit.com/policies/privacy-policy
What are your choices about cookies?
You can decide whether or not to accept cookies through our Cookie Settings link on our Website. Most browsers allow you to configure the browser settings so that cookies from websites cannot be placed on your computer or mobile device. If you choose not to accept cookies, then you may be able to continue browsing our Website but we may not be able to provide you with certain features. If you want to opt out of advertising or performance cookies, then you may do so by reviewing the privacy policies of the third party service providers who serve the advertising and performance cookies identified above. If you would like further information about cookies and how to manage and delete them, please visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
or
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
You can also delete all cookies that are already on your computer. If you do this, however, you may have to manually adjust some preferences every time you visit a site and the Product, Website and functionalities may not work.
What are your choices about cookies and interest-based advertisements?
Through the Digital Advertising Alliance and Network Advertising Initiative, several media and marketing associations have developed an industry self-regulatory program to give consumers a better understanding of, and greater control over, ads that are customized based on a consumer’s online behavior across different websites and properties. To make choices about internet-based ads from participating third parties, including to opt-out of receiving behaviorally targeted advertisements from participating organizations or to learn more about opting out of advertising cookies, please visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s or Digital Advertising Alliance’s consumer opt-out pages, which are located at
http://networkadvertising.org/choices/
or
www.aboutads.info/choices
. For those users located in the European Union, you can visit the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s user information website a
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
.
15. Previous Privacy Version
August 28, 2023
December 30, 2022
Sub-policy 4
http://de-de.facebook.com/about/privacy:
Startseite des Privacy Centers
Suchen
Informationen zu Datenschutz und Privatsphäre
Zusätzliche Privatsphäre-Ressourcen
Datenschutzrichtlinie
Was ist die Datenschutzrichtlinie und was behandelt sie?
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
Wie verwenden wir deine Informationen?
Wie werden deine Informationen auf Meta-Produkten bzw. mit integrierten Partnern geteilt?
Wie teilen wir Informationen mit Dritten?
Wie arbeiten die Meta-Unternehmen zusammen?
Was ist unsere Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen? Was sind deine Rechte?
Wie lange behalten wir deine Informationen?
Wie übermitteln wir Informationen?
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, wie halten wir geltendes Recht ein bzw. wie verhindern wir Schäden?
Wie erfährst du, dass sich die Richtlinie geändert hat?
So kontaktierst du Meta bei Fragen
Informationen zur Rechtsgrundlage
Weitere Richtlinien und Artikel
Einstellungen
Datenschutzrichtlinie
So verwenden wir Informationen für KI bei Meta
Aufgrund des Feedbacks von Aufsichtsbehörden verschieben wir weiterhin unsere Pläne bezüglich der Verwendung deiner Informationen aus Meta-Produkten zur Weiterentwicklung und Verbesserung von
KI bei Meta
. Wir werden dich informieren, bevor wir mit der Verwendung dieser Informationen zu diesem Zweck beginnen, und dir mitteilen, wie du dein Recht auf Widerspruch ausüben kannst.
Sonstige Aktualisierungen
Wir aktualisieren unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie. Die Änderungen treten am 7. April 2025 in Kraft.
Die neue Richtlinie findest du hier.
Was ist die Datenschutzrichtlinie und was behandelt sie?
Gültig ab 14. November 2024 |
Druckversion ansehen
|
Frühere Versionen ansehen
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir bei Meta möchten, dass du verstehst, welche Informationen wir erheben und wie wir sie verwenden und teilen. Deshalb empfehlen wir dir, unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie zu lesen. Auf diese Weise kannst du die
Meta-Produkte
ganz nach deinen Wünschen nutzen.
In der Datenschutzrichtlinie erläutern wir, wie wir Informationen erheben, verwenden, teilen, speichern und übermitteln. Wir informieren dich außerdem über deine Rechte. Jeder Abschnitt der Richtlinie enthält hilfreiche Beispiele und eine vereinfachte Sprache, um unsere Praktiken leichter verständlich zu machen. Außerdem haben wir Links zu den Ressourcen hinzugefügt, über die du mehr zu den Datenschutzthemen erfahren kannst, die dich interessieren.
Es ist uns wichtig, dass du weißt, wie du deine Privatsphäre kontrollierst. Deshalb zeigen wir dir auch, wo du deine Informationen in den Einstellungen der von dir genutzten Meta-Produkte verwalten kannst. Du kannst
diese Einstellungen aktualisieren
, um dein Nutzungserlebnis anzupassen.
Die vollständige Richtlinie findest du nachstehend.
Welche Produkte behandelt diese Richtlinie?
Mehr zur Verwaltung deiner Privatsphäre erfährst du im Privacy Center
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Welche Informationen wir über dich erheben und verarbeiten, hängt davon ab, wie du unsere
Produkte
nutzt. Zum Beispiel erheben wir andere Informationen, wenn du Möbel im Marketplace verkaufst, als wenn du ein Reel auf Instagram postest. Wenn du unsere Produkte nutzt, erheben wir einige Informationen über dich,
auch wenn du kein Konto hast
.
Diese Informationen erheben wir:
Deine Aktivität und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und sonstigen Dritten:
Was ist, wenn du uns die Erhebung bestimmter Informationen nicht gestattest?
Einige Informationen sind erforderlich, damit unsere Produkte funktionieren. Andere Informationen sind optional, ohne sie könnte jedoch die Qualität deines Erlebnisses beeinträchtigt werden.
Mehr dazu
Was ist, wenn die von uns erhobenen Informationen keine Rückschlüsse auf Einzelpersonen zulassen?
In einigen Fällen werden die Daten – bevor sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt werden – von Dritten aggregiert oder anonymisiert, sodass sie nicht mehr zur Identifizierung von Einzelpersonen dienen können. Wir verwenden diese Informationen wie nachstehend beschrieben, ohne zu versuchen, Einzelpersonen wieder identifizierbar zu machen.
Übernimm die Kontrolle
Verwalte die Informationen, die wir über dich erheben
Privacy Center
Wie verwenden wir deine Informationen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir verwenden
Informationen, die wir erheben
, um dir personalisierte Erlebnisse, einschließlich Werbeanzeigen, zur Verfügung zu stellen (wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen) sowie für die anderen Zwecke, die wir unten ausführlich darlegen.
Für einige dieser Zwecke verwenden wir Informationen
in unseren Produkten
von den Konten, die du zu deiner Kontenübersicht hinzufügst, und
allen deinen Geräten
. Die von uns für diese Zwecke verwendeten Informationen werden automatisch von unseren Systemen verarbeitet. In einigen Fällen nutzen wir jedoch auch eine
manuelle Überprüfung
, um auf deine Informationen zuzugreifen und sie zu überprüfen.
Um weniger Informationen zu verwenden, die mit einzelnen Nutzern verknüpft sind, de-identifizieren wir Informationen in einigen Fällen, fassen sie zusammen oder anonymisieren sie, sodass du damit nicht mehr identifizierbar bist. Wir verwenden diese Informationen auf dieselbe Art und Weise, wie wir deine Informationen wie in diesem Abschnitt beschrieben verwenden.
So verwenden wir deine Informationen:
Zur Bereitstellung, Personalisierung und Verbesserung unserer Produkte
Wir verwenden die uns zur Verfügung stehenden Informationen, um unsere
Produkte
bereitzustellen und zu verbessern. Dies umfasst das Personalisieren von Funktionen, Inhalten und
Empfehlungen
, z. B. deinen
Facebook Feed
, deinen
Instagram-Feed
, deine Stories und Werbeanzeigen (wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen). Wir verwenden die von dir für diese Zwecke freiwillig bereitgestellten
Informationen mit besonderem Schutz
, aber nicht, um dir Werbeanzeigen zu zeigen.
Weitere Infos dazu, wie wir Informationen verwenden, um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern:
So zeigen wir dir Werbeanzeigen (wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen)
So verwenden wir Informationen, um unsere Produkte zu verbessern
So verwenden wir standortbezogene Informationen
Um Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität zu fördern
Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen, um unsere Nutzer vor Schaden zu schützen und um sichere und geschützte Produkte bereitzustellen.
Mehr dazu
Zur Bereitstellung von Messungs- und Analysediensten sowie Unternehmens-Services
Viele Menschen setzen auf unsere Produkte, um ihre Unternehmen zu betreiben bzw. um Inhalte zu teilen. Wir unterstützen sie dabei, zu messen, wie gut ihre Werbeanzeigen und sonstigen Inhalte, Produkte und Dienste funktionieren.
Mehr dazu
Für die Kommunikation mit dir
Wir kommunizieren mit dir unter Verwendung der Informationen, die du uns bereitgestellt hast, wie z. B. Kontaktinformationen, die du in deinem Profil angegeben hast.
Mehr dazu
Für Forschung und Innovation für soziale Zwecke
Wir verwenden uns zur Verfügung stehende Informationen, Informationen von Forschern sowie Datensätze aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen, von Berufsgruppen und von gemeinnützigen Gruppen, um Forschung durchzuführen und zu unterstützen.
Mehr dazu
Wie werden deine Informationen auf Meta-Produkten bzw. mit integrierten Partnern geteilt?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Auf Meta-Produkten
Erfahre mehr über die verschiedenen Fälle, in denen deine Informationen auf unseren
Produkten
geteilt werden können:
Personen und Konten, mit denen du Inhalte teilst bzw. kommunizierst
Inhalte, die andere über dich (erneut) teilen
Öffentliche Inhalte
Mit integrierten Partnern
Du kannst dich freiwillig mit
integrierten Partnern
verbinden, die unsere Produkte nutzen. Wenn du dies tust, erhalten diese integrierten Partner Informationen über dich und deine Aktivität.
Diese integrierten Partner können immer auf die Informationen zugreifen, die auf unseren Produkten öffentlich sind. Weitere Infos zu sonstigen Informationen, die sie erhalten, und dazu, wie sie mit deinen Informationen umgehen:
Wenn du das Produkt bzw. den Dienst eines integrierten Partners nutzt
Wenn du in einem Produkt oder Dienst eines integrierten Partners mit Inhalten anderer Personen interagierst
So gehen integrierte Partner mit deinen Informationen um
Übernimm die Kontrolle
Erfahre mehr über Zielgruppen.
Privacy Center
Apps und Websites verwalten
Wie teilen wir Informationen mit Dritten?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir verkaufen keine deiner Informationen an irgendjemanden und werden das auch in Zukunft niemals tun. Außerdem verpflichten wir
Partner
und sonstige
Dritte
, Regeln dazu einzuhalten, wie sie die Informationen, die wir bereitstellen, verwenden und offenlegen dürfen und wie nicht.
Weitere Einzelheiten dazu, an wen wir Informationen weitergeben:
Partner
Werbetreibende und Audience Network-Publisher (wenn wir dir Werbeanzeigen auf Meta-Produkten zeigen)
Partner, die unsere Analysedienste nutzen
Partner, die Waren und Dienstleistungen in unseren Produkten und auf unseren Plattformen für E-Commerce-Dienste anbieten
Integrierte Partner
Anbieter
Anbieter für Messlösungen
Anbieter für Marketinglösungen
Dienstleister
Dienstleister
Dritte
Externe Forscher
KI-Integrationen
Sonstige Dritte
Wir teilen außerdem Informationen mit sonstigen
Dritten
als Reaktion auf rechtliche Anfragen, um geltendes Recht einzuhalten oder um Schäden zu verhindern.
Lies die Richtlinie
.
Wenn wir unser gesamtes Unternehmen bzw. Teile davon an jemand anderen verkaufen oder übertragen, geben wir in einigen Fällen deine Informationen im Rahmen dieser Transaktion an den neuen Eigentümer weiter, jedoch nur im gesetzlich zulässigen Rahmen.
Wie arbeiten die Meta-Unternehmen zusammen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir sind Teil der
Meta-Unternehmen
, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen bereitstellen. Zu den
Produkten der Meta-Unternehmen
zählen alle
Meta-Produkte
, für die diese Richtlinie gilt, sowie weitere Produkte wie u. a. WhatsApp.
Wir teilen die von uns erhobenen Informationen sowie die Infrastruktur, die Systeme und die Technologie mit den anderen Meta-Unternehmen.
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Informationen in andere Länder übermitteln.
Außerdem verarbeiten wir Informationen, die wir über dich von anderen Meta-Unternehmen erhalten, gemäß deren Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien und soweit dies nach anwendbarem Recht zulässig ist. In einigen Fällen fungiert Meta als
Dienstleister
für andere Meta-Unternehmen. Wir handeln in deren Auftrag und im Einklang mit deren Anweisungen und Nutzungsbedingungen.
Warum wir Informationen innerhalb der Meta-Unternehmen weitergeben
Meta-Produkte geben Informationen an andere Meta-Unternehmen weiter:
um Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität zu fördern sowie das anwendbare Recht einzuhalten
um optionale Features und Integrationen bereitzustellen
um herauszufinden, wie Personen Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen nutzen und mit ihnen interagieren
Einige Beispiele
dazu, warum wir Informationen teilen.
Weitere Ressourcen
Die Datenschutzrichtlinien der anderen Meta-Unternehmen lesen
Facebook-Hilfebereich
Was ist unsere Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen? Was sind deine Rechte?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Nach geltendem Datenschutzrecht benötigen Unternehmen eine Rechtsgrundlage zur Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten. Mit „Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten“ meinen wir die Arten, auf die wir deine Informationen so erfassen, verwenden und teilen, wie wir es in den anderen Abschnitten dieser Richtlinie oben beschrieben haben.
Was ist unsere Rechtsgrundlage?
Gemäß der DSGVO und anderen relevanten Datenschutzgesetzen stehen dir folgende Rechte zu:
Auskunftsrecht und Recht auf Berichtigung
Recht auf Widerruf der Einwilligung
Deine Informationen übertragen
Recht auf Herunterladen deiner Informationen
Recht auf Löschung von Informationen
Widerspruchsrecht
Recht auf Einreichen einer Beschwerde
Wie lange behalten wir deine Informationen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir behalten deine Informationen so lange, wie wir sie brauchen, um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen, rechtliche Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen oder unsere Interessen oder die Interessen anderer zu schützen. Wir entscheiden von Fall zu Fall, wie lange wir Informationen benötigen. Bei dieser Entscheidung berücksichtigen wir folgende Faktoren:
ob wir sie benötigen, um unsere Produkte zu betreiben oder bereitzustellen. Beispielsweise müssen wir einige deiner Informationen aufbewahren, um dein Konto beizubehalten.
Mehr dazu
.
Für welches Feature wir sie verwenden und wie dieses Feature funktioniert. Beispielsweise werden Nachrichten, die mit dem Selbstlöschmodus von Messenger gesendet werden, weniger lang als normale Nachrichten aufbewahrt.
Mehr dazu
.
Wie lange wir die Informationen zur Erfüllung bestimmter rechtlicher Verpflichtungen aufbewahren müssen.
Einige Beispiele
.
Ob wir sie für andere berechtigte Zwecke benötigen, z. B. um Schaden zu verhindern, mögliche Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen, den Schutz, die Sicherheit und Integrität zu fördern oder uns selbst zu schützen, darunter unsere Rechte, unser Eigentum und unsere Produkte.
In einigen Fällen und aus bestimmten Gründen bewahren wir Informationen für einen längeren Zeitraum auf. In
unserer Richtlinie
erfährst du, wann wir deine Informationen aufbewahren dürfen.
Wie übermitteln wir Informationen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Warum werden Informationen in andere Länder übermittelt?
Wohin werden Informationen übermittelt?
Wie schützen wir deine Informationen?
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, wie halten wir geltendes Recht ein bzw. wie verhindern wir Schäden?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Aus folgenden Gründen greifen wir auf deine Informationen zu und speichern, verwenden und teilen sie:
als Reaktion auf rechtliche Anfragen wie Durchsuchungsbeschlüsse, gerichtliche Entscheidungen, gerichtliche Aufträge zur Herausgabe von Informationen („production order“) oder Vorladungen. Diese Anfragen stammen von
Dritten
wie zum Beispiel von Prozessführenden in Zivilprozessen oder von Strafverfolgungs- und anderen Behörden.
Mehr dazu
, wie wir auf rechtliche Anfragen reagieren.
Im Einklang mit geltendem Recht
Um den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Integrität von
Meta-Produkten
, der Nutzer, der Mitarbeiter, des Eigentums und der Öffentlichkeit sicherzustellen.
Mehr dazu
.
Möglicherweise können wir für einen längeren Zeitraum auf deine Informationen zugreifen oder sie speichern.
Mehr dazu
.
Wie erfährst du, dass sich die Richtlinie geändert hat?
Wir benachrichtigen dich, bevor wir wesentliche Änderungen an dieser Richtlinie vornehmen. Du erhältst dann die Gelegenheit, die überarbeitete Richtlinie zu lesen, bevor du dich dazu entscheidest, unsere Produkte weiterhin zu nutzen.
So kontaktierst du Meta bei Fragen
Weitere Informationen zur Funktionsweise des Datenschutzes findest du auf
Facebook
, auf
Instagram
und im
Facebook-Hilfebereich
. Bei Fragen zu dieser Richtlinie oder bei Fragen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen bezüglich deiner Informationen kannst du uns wie unten beschrieben kontaktieren.
Der Datenverantwortliche bezüglich deiner Informationen ist Meta Platforms Ireland Limited. Dieses Unternehmen kannst du
online kontaktieren
oder per Post unter:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Irland
Kontaktaufnahme mit dem Datenschutzbeauftragten
für Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
Du hast außerdem das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei der federführenden Aufsichtsbehörde für Meta Platforms Ireland, der irischen Datenschutzkommission, oder bei deiner lokalen Aufsichtsbehörde einzureichen.
Informationen zur Rechtsgrundlage
Einwilligung
Wir verarbeiten Informationen wie im Folgenden beschrieben, wenn du uns deine Einwilligung dazu erteilt hast. Diese Einwilligung können wir über produktinterne Erlebnisse, zur Aktivierung bestimmter Funktionen oder zur Aktivierung gerätebasierter Einstellungen einholen. Welche Informationskategorien wir nutzen sowie warum und wie sie verarbeitet werden, wird nachstehend erläutert:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Verarbeitung von Informationen mit besonderem Schutz, die du zur Verfügung stellst, damit wir sie mit den von dir Ausgewählten teilen können, um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern sowie Analysen durchzuführen. Zu diesen Zwecken erheben, speichern, veröffentlichen und nutzen wir automatisierte oder manchmal auch manuelle Verarbeitungen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Informationen mit besonderem Schutz, die du freiwillig bereitstellst (wie zum Beispiel deine religiösen Ansichten, sexuelle Orientierung, politische Einstellung, Gesundheitszustand, ethnische Zugehörigkeit, philosophische Weltanschauung oder Mitgliedschaft in einer Gewerkschaft) oder im Rahmen von Umfragen angibst, an denen du freiwillig teilnimmst, und dort, wo du deine ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt hast
Personalisierung von Werbeanzeigen auf den Meta-Produkten:
Wenn wir dir je nach deinen
Einstellungen
Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen, einschließlich Meta Audience Network, verwenden wir deine Informationen über das Konto bzw. die Konten hinweg in deiner Kontoübersicht, einschließlich der Verwendung von Cookies, um deine Werbeanzeigen zu personalisieren und ihre Performance zu messen.
Wenn wir dir Werbung auf den Meta-Produkten zeigen, verarbeitet unser Anzeigensystem automatisch Informationen, die wir über dich erhoben und gespeichert haben. In Übereinstimmung mit deinen Einstellungen für Werbung verarbeitet unser Anzeigensystem diese Informationen, um deine Interessen und Präferenzen zu verstehen und personalisierte Werbung auf den Meta-Produkten für dich zu schalten.
Erfahre mehr
über deine Einstellungen für Werbung.
Unser Anzeigensystem priorisiert, welche Werbung dir angezeigt wird. Grundlage dafür ist die von den Werbetreibenden gewünschte Zielgruppe. Im Anschluss zeigen wir die Werbung den Personen, die daran interessiert sein könnten.
Erfahre mehr
darüber, wie unser Anzeigensystem funktioniert.
Erfahre mehr
darüber, wie wir die Werbeanzeigen auswählen, die du siehst.
Du kannst deine Auswahl jederzeit in den „Werbepräferenzen“ ändern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge oder Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, einschließlich Werbeanzeigen, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst, und wie du mit ihnen interagierst
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden)
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast (z. B. GPS-Standort)
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest
Standortbezogene Informationen
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Nutzung von Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und anderen Dritten, um die Werbeanzeigen, die du siehst, auf dich zuzuschneiden: Wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen, verwenden wir mit deiner Zustimmung Informationen, die Partner, Anbieter und andere Dritte uns bezüglich Aktivitäten außerhalb der Meta-Produkte bereitstellen und die wir mit dir verknüpft haben, um Werbeanzeigen zu personalisieren, die wir dir auf den Meta-Produkten sowie auf Websites, Apps und Geräten, die unsere Werbedienste nutzen, zeigen. Wir erhalten diese Informationen unabhängig davon, ob du bei unseren Produkten angemeldet bist bzw. ein Konto auf ihnen hast oder nicht. Mehr dazu erfährst du in der
Cookie-Richtlinie
.
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe deiner Kontakt-, Profil- oder sonstiger Informationen an Dritte auf Antrag von dir, wenn du bestimmte Produkte von uns verwendest. Wenn du uns beispielsweise dazu anweist, teilen wir deine E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Informationen, die du gegebenenfalls freiwillig teilst, mit einem Werbetreibenden, damit dieser dich mit zusätzlichen Informationen über ein beworbenes Produkt kontaktieren kann. Um welche Art von Dritten es sich handelt und welche Informationskategorien wir weitergeben, hängt davon ab, unter welchen Umständen du uns bittest, deine Informationen weiterzugeben.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie deine Kontakt-, Profil- oder sonstige Informationen wie Beiträge oder Kommentare
Erheben von Informationen, deren Erhalt du uns durch die von dir aktivierten gerätebasierten Einstellungen gestattest (wie den Zugriff auf deinen GPS-Standort, deine Kamera oder Fotos), damit wir diese nutzen können, um die bei der Aktivierung der Einstellung beschriebenen Funktionen oder Dienste bereitzustellen.
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Informationen aus den Geräteeinstellungen
Überprüfung deiner Identität oder deines Kontos oder Hilfe beim Schutz vor verdächtigen Aktivitäten, einschließlich Nachahmung und Identitätsmissbrauch, mithilfe von Gesichtsanalyse, die auf Wunsch auch Gesichtserkennungstechnologie umfassen kann.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Deine Kontodaten, dein Profilbild oder
dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es bereitstellen möchtest
Wenn wir Informationen verarbeiten, die du uns auf Grundlage deiner Einwilligung bereitgestellt hast, hast du das Recht, die Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne dass die Rechtmäßigkeit der aufgrund deiner Einwilligung bis zum Widerruf erfolgten Verarbeitung berührt wird. Du hast auch das Recht, die Informationen, die du uns auf der Grundlage deiner Einwilligung zur Verfügung stellst, zu übertragen. Um deine Rechte auszuüben, nutze deine gerätebasierten Einstellungen sowie die Facebook-Einstellungen, die Instagram-Einstellungen und unsere Hilfebereiche.
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
In Bezug auf alle Personen, die die Geschäftsfähigkeit zum Abschluss eines durchsetzbaren Vertrags haben (z. B. weil sie im Land ihres Wohnsitzes volljährig sind), verarbeiten wir die Informationen in dem für den Abschluss und die Erfüllung unserer Verträge mit dir erforderlichen Maß (die
Meta-Nutzungsbedingungen
und
Instagram-Nutzungsbedingungen
, die
ergänzenden Nutzungsbedingungen von Meta Platforms Technologies
, die
ergänzenden Portal-Nutzungsbedingungen
, die
Meta AI-Nutzungsbedingungen
und die
ergänzenden Meta View-Nutzungsbedingungen
, zusammen „die Nutzungsbedingungen“). Die Zwecke, für die wir Informationen zur Erfüllung unserer Verträge verarbeiten, die von uns verwendeten Informationskategorien und wie die Informationen verarbeitet werden, werden nachstehend erläutert:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Personalisierung der Meta-Produkte (mit Ausnahme von Werbeanzeigen): Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch Informationen, die wir im Zusammenhang mit dir und anderen Personen erhoben und gespeichert haben, um deine Interessen und Präferenzen zu bewerten und zu verstehen und dir über die Meta-Produkte hinweg gemäß unseren Nutzungsbedingungen personalisierte Erlebnisse zu bieten. Auf diese Weise:
personalisieren wir Funktionen und Inhalte (wie deinen
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram-Feed
und Stories); und
können wir dir auf unseren Produkten bzw. außerhalb dieser Vorschläge unterbreiten (z. B. Personen, die du kennen könntest, Gruppen oder Veranstaltungen, für die du dich interessieren könntest, oder Themen, die du eventuell abonnieren möchtest).
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast (wie GPS-Standort)
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Bereitstellung und Verbesserung unserer Meta-Produkte: Die Bereitstellung der Meta-Produkte umfasst die Erhebung, das Speichern und ggf. Teilen, Profiling, Überprüfen und Kuratieren und in einigen Fällen nicht nur die automatisierte Verarbeitung, sondern auch manuelle Reviews (durch einen Mitarbeiter), um:
dein Konto und Profil zu erstellen und zu verwalten,
dein Konto für Meta-Produkte (einschließlich deiner öffentlichen Profilinformationen) zur Anmeldung oder Weitergabe deiner Informationen mit einem integrierten Partner zu verknüpfen,
das Teilen von Inhalten und Statusmeldungen zu ermöglichen,
Funktionen bereitzustellen und zu kuratieren,
Messaging-Dienste bereitzustellen sowie die Möglichkeit, Sprach- und Videoanrufe zu tätigen und sich mit anderen zu verbinden,
Technologie der künstlichen Intelligenz
in unseren Produkten bereitzustellen und einzupflegen, um die Erstellung von Inhalten wie Text, Audio, Bildern und Videos zu ermöglichen, auch indem deine Nutzung von Inhalten in den Funktionen verstanden und erkannt wird,
Analysen durchzuführen und
deine Käufe und Zahlungen mithilfe von Meta Pay oder anderen Meta-Checkout-Funktionen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die uns vorliegen, auch, um Verbesserungen an unseren Produkten zu entwickeln, zu erforschen und zu testen. Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen zu folgenden Zwecken:
Sehen, ob ein Produkt ordnungsgemäß funktioniert
Nach Fehlern suchen und diese gegebenenfalls beheben
Neue Produkte und Funktionen testen, um deren Funktionalität zu prüfen
Feedback zu unseren Ideen für Produkte oder Funktionen einholen
Durchführung von Umfragen und anderer Forschung dazu, was dir an unseren Produkten und Marken gefällt und was wir noch besser machen können
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Deine öffentlichen Informationen (darunter Name, Benutzername und Profilbild)
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit in und auf den Meta-Produkten: Die Meta-Produkte sollen dazu beitragen, den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherzustellen. Wir verarbeiten Informationen, die wir mit dir verknüpft haben, und wenden dabei automatisierte Verarbeitungstechniken an und führen in einigen Fällen einen manuellen Review (durch einen Mitarbeiter) durch, um:
Konten, Identität und Aktivität zu verifizieren,
Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu ermitteln und zu verfolgen. In einigen Fällen werden die von uns zu Verstößen getroffenen Entscheidungen vom
Oversight Board
überprüft, um
verdächtige Aktivitäten zu untersuchen,
schädliches oder rechtswidriges Verhalten zu erkennen, zu verhindern und zu bekämpfen, z. B. durch Überprüfen und in einigen Fällen Entfernen von Inhalten, die uns gemeldet wurden,
Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken und zu verhindern,
Bedrohungen unseres Personals bzw. Eigentums aufzudecken und zu unterbinden, und
die Integrität unserer Produkte zu wahren.
Um weitere Informationen zu Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit im Allgemeinen im Zusammenhang mit Meta-Produkten zu erhalten, besuche den Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich und die Instagram-Sicherheitstipps.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Für die Kommunikation mit dir: Wir verwenden die Informationen, die du uns zur Verfügung gestellt hast (wie Kontaktinformationen in deinem Profil), um dir eine Mitteilung zu senden, wie eine E-Mail oder einen Hinweis in einem Produkt, zum Beispiel in folgenden Fällen:
Wir kontaktieren dich per E-Mail oder per Benachrichtigung innerhalb der Produkte im Zusammenhang mit den Meta-Produkten, produktbezogenen Angelegenheiten, Forschung oder um dich über unsere Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien zu informieren.
Wir verwenden auch Kontaktinformationen wie deine E-Mail-Adresse, um zu antworten, wenn du uns kontaktierst.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Kontaktinformationen in deinem Profil und deine Kommunikation mit uns
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Übermittlung, Speicherung oder Verarbeitung deiner Informationen weltweit. Wir teilen von uns erhobene Informationen weltweit, sowohl intern zwischen unseren Niederlassungen und Rechenzentren als auch extern mit unseren Partnern, Dritten und Dienstleistern. Da Meta global tätig ist und Nutzer, Partner sowie Mitarbeiter auf der ganzen Welt hat, sind Übermittlungen für folgende Zwecke notwendig:
um die Dienste zu betreiben und bereitzustellen, die in den Nutzungsbedingungen beschrieben werden, die für das/die von dir genutzte(n) Meta-Produkt(e) gelten. Hierzu gehört auch, es dir zu ermöglichen, weltweit Informationen zu teilen und dich mit deiner Familie und deinen Freunden zu vernetzen; und
damit wir unsere Produkte reparieren, analysieren und verbessern können.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wir werden die uns zur Verfügung stehenden Informationen verwenden, um diese Dienste bereitzustellen; wenn du bestimmte Informationen nicht angeben möchtest (abgesehen von den begrenzten Kontoinformationen, die erforderlich sind, um ein
Facebook-Konto
oder ein
Instagram-Konto
zu erstellen), kann dein Erlebnis bei der Nutzung der Meta-Produkte beeinträchtigt werden. Zum Beispiel siehst du möglicherweise weniger relevante Empfehlungen in den Produkten oder deine Nutzung der Produkte kann eingeschränkt sein.
Wenn wir Informationen verarbeiten, die du uns als für den Abschluss und die Erfüllung unserer Verträge mit dir erforderlich bereitstellst, hast du gemäß der DSGVO das Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit. Um deine Rechte auszuüben, gehe bitte zu den Facebook-Einstellungen, den Instagram-Einstellungen oder informiere dich in unseren Hilfebereichen.
Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung
Welche Informationskategorien wir verwenden, warum wir deine Informationen Daten aufgrund der Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung verarbeiten und wie die Verarbeitung erfolgt, ist nachstehend dargelegt:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, wenn dies nach dem Gesetz erforderlich ist: Wenn wir zur Offenlegung von Informationen verpflichtet sind, beispielsweise wenn wir eine gültige rechtliche Anfrage für bestimmte Informationen erhalten (etwa einen irischen Durchsuchungsbeschluss) werden wir auf deine Informationen zugreifen, sie aufbewahren und/oder sie an Aufsichtsbehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden oder andere weitergeben.
Die Art und Weise, wie die Informationen verarbeitet werden, hängt von den jeweiligen Umständen hab. Mehr dazu erfährst du unter
Wie antworten wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, verhindern Schäden und fördern die Sicherheit und Integrität?
. Unter
Informationen für Strafverfolgungsbehörden
geben wir Informationen zu den operativen Richtlinien, die die Strafverfolgungsbehörden befolgen müssen.
Beispiele für irische Gesetze und in Irland durchsetzbare EU-Gesetze, durch die eine Verpflichtung entstehen könnte, sodass wir zur Verarbeitung der Informationen, die wir über dich gespeichert haben, verpflichtet sind:
Zivil- und Handelssachen: wenn wir eine gerichtliche Entscheidung erhalten oder anderweitig verpflichtet sind, Informationen für die Zwecke von Gerichtsverfahren offenzulegen, z. B. im Rahmen der Verordnung (EU) Nr. 1215/2012 über die gerichtliche Zuständigkeit und die Anerkennung und Vollstreckung von Entscheidungen in Zivil- und Handelssachen.
Strafsachen: zur Erfüllung von Anfragen von irischen Strafverfolgungsbehörden zur Bereitstellung von Informationen im Zusammenhang mit einer Ermittlung, z. B. im Rahmen von Section 10 des Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 wie durch 6(1)(a) des Criminal Justice Act 2006 geändert, oder zur Ergreifung von Maßnahmen, um Strafverfolgungsbehörden Informationen zu melden, sofern erforderlich.
Verbraucherangelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen im Rahmen von Verbrauchergesetzen wie dem Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Unternehmens- und Steuerangelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen wie dem Companies Act 2014.
Aufsichtsrechtliche Angelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen zur Interaktion mit Aufsichtsbehörden, z. B. dem Data Protection Commission, im Rahmen der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung und des Data Protection Act 2018.
Finanzangelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen im Rahmen geltender Gesetze für Finanzdienstleistungen wie der European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
Sieh die
aktuelle Liste der Gesetze
an, die in Irland durchsetzbar sind und durch die eine rechtliche Verpflichtung für Meta entsteht, welche zur Verarbeitung von Informationen führt. Durch neue Gesetze, die erlassen werden, oder andere Verpflichtungen, die für unsere Verarbeitung deiner Informationen verbindlich werden, sind wir unter Umständen zur Verarbeitung deiner Informationen verpflichtet, und wir werden diese Liste von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren.
Die Informationskategorien hängen von den jeweiligen Umständen jeder verpflichtenden Anfrage oder Verpflichtung ab. Es werden nur die Informationen verarbeitet, die zur Erfüllung der entsprechenden rechtlichen Verpflichtungen erforderlich sind. Zum Beispiel: Bei Zivilsachen sind dies in der Regel eingeschränkte Informationen (wie Kontaktdaten und Login-Informationen). Je nach den Umständen können jedoch auch folgende Kategorien dazugehören:
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Berechtigte Interessen
Wir stützen uns auf unsere berechtigten Interessen bzw. die berechtigten Interessen eines Dritten, sofern nicht deine Interessen oder Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten überwiegen („berechtigte Interessen“). Im Folgenden werden die verwendeten Informationskategorien dargelegt, auf welche berechtigten Interessen wir uns stützen sowie warum und wie die Informationen verarbeitet werden:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Berechtigte Interessen, auf die wir uns stützen
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Wenn du ein registrierter Nutzer der Meta-Produkte bist
In Bezug auf Personen, die nicht volljährig (in den meisten betreffenden Ländern unter 18 Jahre) sind und nur beschränkt geschäftsfähig in Bezug auf den Abschluss eines durchsetzbaren Vertrags sind, können wir deine Informationen möglicherweise nicht aus Gründen der Erforderlichkeit für die Vertragserfüllung verarbeiten.
Personalisierung der Meta-Produkte: Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch Informationen, die wir im Zusammenhang mit dir und anderen Personen erhoben und gespeichert haben, um deine Interessen und Präferenzen zu bewerten und zu verstehen und dir über die Meta-Produkte hinweg gemäß unseren Nutzungsbedingungen personalisierte Erlebnisse zu bieten. Auf diese Weise:
personalisieren wir Funktionen und Inhalte (wie deinen
News Feed
,
Instagram-Feed
und Stories),
können wir dir auf unseren Produkten bzw. außerhalb dieser Vorschläge unterbreiten (z. B. Personen, die du kennen könntest, Gruppen oder Veranstaltungen, für die du dich interessieren könntest, oder Themen, die du eventuell abonnieren möchtest).
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Informationen über dich verwenden, um dein Erlebnis in und auf den Meta-Produkten zu personalisieren, und wie wir die Werbeanzeigen auswählen, die dir angezeigt werden.
Um innovative Produkte und Funktionen zu erstellen, bereitzustellen, zu unterstützen und zu erhalten, die es Minderjährigen ermöglichen, sich auszudrücken, zu kommunizieren und für sie interessante Informationen und Gemeinschaften zu entdecken und damit zu interagieren, Gemeinschaften zu bilden und Tools und Funktionen zu nutzen, die ihr Wohlbefinden fördern.
Um wichtige Updates im Zusammenhang mit unseren Produkten mit unseren minderjährigen Nutzern zu teilen und unsere Produkte zu bewerben.
Um die Meta-Produkte auf einheitliche Weise bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern und gleichzeitig zusätzliche Schutzmaßnahmen für Personen bereitzustellen, die noch nicht das Mündigkeitsalter des jeweiligen Mitgliedsstaats erreicht haben.
Das berechtigte Interesse unserer Nutzer, in der Lage zu sein, auf die Meta-Produkte zuzugreifen und dass diese Produkte für jeden Nutzer personalisiert werden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast (wie GPS-Standort)
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
(außer Verwendung von Partnerdaten, um Werbeanzeigen auf dich zuzuschneiden)
Bereitstellung und Verbesserung unserer Meta-Produkte: Die Bereitstellung der Meta-Produkte umfasst die Erhebung, das Speichern und ggf. Teilen, Profiling, Überprüfen und Kuratieren, die automatisierte Verarbeitung und in einigen Fällen das manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfen, um:
dein Konto und Profil zu erstellen und zu verwalten,
dein Konto für Meta-Produkte (einschließlich deiner öffentlichen Profilinformationen) zur Anmeldung oder Weitergabe deiner Informationen mit einem integrierten Partner zu verknüpfen,
das Teilen von Inhalten und Statusmeldungen zu ermöglichen,
Funktionen bereitzustellen und zu kuratieren,
Messaging-Dienste bereitzustellen sowie die Möglichkeit, Sprach- und Videoanrufe zu tätigen und sich mit anderen zu verbinden,
Werbeprodukte bereitzustellen,
Technologie der künstlichen Intelligenz
in unseren Produkten bereitzustellen und einzupflegen, um die Erstellung von Inhalten wie Text, Audio, Bildern und Videos zu ermöglichen, auch indem deine Nutzung von Inhalten in den Funktionen verstanden und erkannt wird, und
Analysen durchzuführen.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die uns vorliegen, auch, um Verbesserungen an unseren Produkten zu entwickeln, zu erforschen und zu testen. Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen zu folgenden Zwecken:
Sehen, ob ein Produkt ordnungsgemäß funktioniert
Nach Fehlern suchen und diese gegebenenfalls beheben
Neue Produkte und Funktionen testen, um deren Funktionalität zu prüfen
Feedback zu unseren Ideen für Produkte oder Funktionen einholen
Durchführung von Umfragen und anderer Forschung dazu, was dir an unseren Produkten und Marken gefällt und was wir noch besser machen können
Um innovative Produkte und Funktionen zu erstellen, bereitzustellen, zu unterstützen und zu erhalten, die es Minderjährigen ermöglichen, sich auszudrücken, zu kommunizieren und für sie interessante Informationen und Gemeinschaften zu entdecken und damit zu interagieren, Gemeinschaften zu bilden und Tools und Funktionen zu nutzen, die ihr Wohlbefinden fördern.
Um es nicht volljährigen Personen zu ermöglichen, die Meta-Produkte auf eine einfache und intuitive Weise zu nutzen und sich mit ihnen zu verbinden.
Um die Meta-Produkte auf einheitliche Weise bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern und gleichzeitig zusätzliche Schutzmaßnahmen für Personen bereitzustellen, die noch nicht das Mündigkeitsalter des jeweiligen Mitgliedsstaats erreicht haben.
Das berechtigte Interesse unserer Nutzer, in der Lage zu sein, auf die Meta-Produkte zuzugreifen und dass diese Produkte für jeden Nutzer personalisiert werden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Deine öffentlichen Profilinformationen (darunter Name, Benutzername und Profilbild)
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit in und auf den Meta-Produkten: Die Meta-Produkte sollen dazu beitragen, den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherzustellen. Wir verarbeiten Informationen, die wir mit dir verknüpft haben, und wenden dabei automatisierte Verarbeitungstechniken an und führen in einigen Fällen einen manuellen Review (durch einen Mitarbeiter) durch, um:
Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren,
Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien ermitteln und verfolgen. In einigen Fällen werden die von uns zu Verstößen getroffenen Entscheidungen vom Oversight Board überprüft,
verdächtige Aktivitäten zu untersuchen,
schädliches oder rechtswidriges Verhalten zu erkennen, zu verhindern und zu bekämpfen, z. B. durch Überprüfen und in einigen Fällen Entfernen von Inhalten, die uns gemeldet wurden,
Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken und zu verhindern,
Bedrohungen unseres Personals bzw. Eigentums aufzudecken und zu unterbinden, und
die Integrität unserer Produkte zu wahren.
Um weitere Informationen zu Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit im Allgemeinen im Zusammenhang mit den Meta-Produkten zu erhalten, besuche den Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich und die Instagram-Sicherheitstipps.
Um unsere Plattform und unser Netzwerk zu sichern, Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken, zu verhindern und zu beheben, die Meta-Produkte von schädlichen oder unangemessenen Inhalten freizuhalten, verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen und um den Schutz von Minderjährigen sicherzustellen, u. a., um sie vor Ausbeutung oder sonstigen Schäden zu schützen, für die solche Personen eventuell besonders anfällig sind.
Im Interesse unserer Nutzer und der breiten Öffentlichkeit, um negative Erlebnisse zu verhindern und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit zu fördern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Kommunikation mit dir:
Wir verwenden die Informationen, die du uns zur Verfügung gestellt hast (wie Kontaktinformationen, die du in deinem Profil eingegeben hast), um dir eine Mitteilung zu senden, wie eine E-Mail oder einen Hinweis in einem Produkt, zum Beispiel in folgenden Fällen:
Wir kontaktieren dich per E-Mail oder per Benachrichtigung innerhalb der Produkte im Zusammenhang mit den Meta-Produkten, produktbezogenen Angelegenheiten, Forschung oder um dich über unsere Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien zu informieren.
Wir verwenden auch Kontaktinformationen wie deine E-Mail-Adresse, um dir zu antworten, wenn du uns kontaktierst.
Um wichtige Updates im Zusammenhang mit unseren Produkten mit unseren minderjährigen Nutzern zu teilen und unsere Produkte zu bewerben.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Kontaktinformationen in deinem Profil und deine Kommunikation mit uns
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
In Bezug auf alle Personen, einschließlich Minderjähriger
Bereitstellung von Messungen, Analysen und anderen Unternehmens-Services für Unternehmen und andere Partner:
Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch, sowie teilweise durch manuelle (menschliche) Verarbeitung, Informationen, die wir über dich und andere erhoben und gespeichert haben. Wir verwenden diese Informationen, um:
Unternehmen und anderen Partnern Einblicke und Messberichte zur Verfügung zu stellen, um ihnen zu helfen, die Effektivität und Verbreitung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste oder der ihrer Kunden zu messen, um zu verstehen, welche Art von Personen ihre Inhalte sehen, und die Performance ihrer Inhalte auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte nachzuvollziehen, und
aggregierte Nutzeranalysen und Insights-Berichte bereitzustellen, die Nutzern, Unternehmen und anderen Partnern helfen, beispielsweise die Zielgruppen, mit denen sie in Verbindung treten möchten, besser zu verstehen, sowie die Personengruppen, die ihre Produkte und Dienste nutzen und wie Personen mit ihren Inhalten, Websites, Apps, Produkten und Diensten interagieren, einschließlich der Verbindung zu Meta-Produkten, der Leistung dieser Verbindung und Netzwerke sowie der Nutzererfahrung damit.
In unserem Interesse, um genaue und zuverlässige Berichte für unsere Unternehmen und sonstigen Partner bereitzustellen, um eine genaue Preisgestaltung und genaue Performancestatistiken sicherzustellen, um den Wert aufzuzeigen, den unsere Partner durch die Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen realisieren, und um unseren sonstigen Partnern angemessene Zahlungs- und Abrechnungsoptionen zur Verfügung zu stellen, und
im Interesse von Entwicklern und sonstigen Partnern, um ihnen zu helfen, Erkenntnisse über ihre Kunden zu erlangen und ihre Geschäfte zu verbessern, unsere Preismodelle zu validieren und die Effektivität ihrer Produkte, Dienste, Online-Inhalte auf und außerhalb von den Produkten der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerten.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen:
Bereitstellung von Messungen, Analysen und anderen Unternehmens-Services für Unternehmen, Werbetreibende und andere Partner:
Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch, sowie teilweise durch manuelle (menschliche) Verarbeitung, Informationen, die wir über dich und andere erhoben und gespeichert haben. Wir verwenden diese Informationen, um:
Unternehmen, Werbetreibenden und anderen Partnern Einblicke und Messberichte zur Verfügung zu stellen, um ihnen zu helfen, die Effektivität und Verbreitung ihrer Werbeanzeigen, Inhalte und Dienste oder der ihrer Kunden zu messen, um zu verstehen, welche Art von Personen ihre Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen sehen, und die Performance ihrer Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte nachzuvollziehen, und
aggregierte Nutzeranalysen und Insights-Berichte bereitzustellen, die Unternehmen, Werbetreibenden und anderen Partnern helfen, beispielsweise die Zielgruppen, mit denen sie in Verbindung treten möchten, besser zu verstehen, sowie die Personengruppen, die ihre Produkte und Dienste nutzen und wie Personen mit ihren Websites, Apps, Produkten und Diensten interagieren, einschließlich der Verbindung zu Meta-Produkten, der Leistung dieser Verbindung und Netzwerke sowie der Nutzererfahrung damit.
In unserem Interesse, um genaue und zuverlässige Berichte für unsere Unternehmen, Werbetreibenden, und sonstigen Partner bereitzustellen, um eine genaue Preisgestaltung und genaue Performancestatistiken sicherzustellen, um den Wert aufzuzeigen, den unsere Partner durch die Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen realisieren, und um unseren Werbetreibenden und sonstigen Partnern angemessene Zahlungs- und Abrechnungsoptionen zur Verfügung zu stellen, und
Im Interesse von Werbetreibenden, Entwicklern und sonstigen Partnern, um ihnen zu helfen, Erkenntnisse über ihre Kunden zu erlangen und ihre Geschäfte zu verbessern, unsere Preismodelle zu validieren und die Effektivität ihrer Produkte, Dienste, Online-Inhalte und Werbung auf und außerhalb von den Produkten der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerten.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Kommunikation, Interaktion und Teilen von Inhalten über die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen hinweg:
Um ein nahtloses, einheitliches und reichhaltigeres, innovatives Erlebnis über die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen hinweg bereitzustellen und Interaktionen über verschiedene Apps hinweg sowie das Teilen, Anzeigen und Interagieren mit Inhalten, einschließlich Posts und Videos, zu ermöglichen.
In unserem Interesse, um nahtlose, einheitliche und reichhaltigere, innovative Kommunikation, Interaktion und Teilen von Erlebnissen über die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen hinweg zu ermöglichen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Business Intelligence und Statistik:
Um in aggregierter Form deine Nutzung unserer Produkte und über diese hinweg zu verstehen, um Personen und Unternehmen richtig zählen zu können und
Kennzahlen im direkten Zusammenhang damit zu bestätigen, um zu informieren und die Produktrichtung und ‑entwicklung zu verbessern, und um Berichtspflichten (gegenüber Aktionären/hinsichtlich Gewinnen) nachzukommen.
In unserem Interesse, um die Nutzung unserer Produkte zu messen und die Personen zu zählen, die mit unseren Produkten interagieren, um zu informieren und die Produktrichtung und ‑entwicklung zu verbessern und um die Bereitstellung richtiger und zuverlässiger Berichte sicherzustellen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Bereitstellen von Marketingmitteilungen für dich:
Je nach deinen Einstellungen senden wir dir von Zeit zu Zeit Marketingmitteilungen.
Wir erheben und speichern deine Informationen und verwenden sie, um dir Marketingmitteilungen zu senden, wie z. B. eine E-Mail.
In unserem Interesse, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerben und unser Direktmarketing zu versenden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Informationen und Inhalte, die du zur Verfügung stellst, einschließlich deiner Kontaktinformationen wie z. B. deine E-Mail-Adresse
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Gerätekennungen
Forschung und Innovation für soziale Zwecke:
Wir führen Umfragen durch und verwenden Informationen (u. a. von Forschern, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten), um Forschung und Innovation zu Themen des sozialen Allgemeinwohls, des technologischen Fortschritts, des öffentlichen Interesses, der Gesundheit und des Wohlergehens durchzuführen und zu unterstützen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die uns über Migrationsmuster in Krisensituationen zur Verfügung stehenden Informationen. Dies unterstützt Hilfsorganisationen dabei, Hilfsmittel und Unterstützung an die richtigen Orte zu bringen.
Wir erheben, speichern, verknüpfen, analysieren und wenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken wie Aggregation von Informationen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen an und teilen Informationen, soweit dies erforderlich ist, um auf diese Weise Forschung zu betreiben und Innovationen für soziale Zwecke zu fördern.
Wir unterstützen die Forschung in Bereichen wie künstliche Intelligenz und maschinelles Lernen.
Erfahre mehr
zu unseren Forschungsprogrammen.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um den Stand der Technik bzw. das wissenschaftliche Verständnis bezüglich wichtiger sozialer Themen zu fördern, die unsere Gesellschaft und Welt positiv beeinflussen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Anonymisieren deiner Informationen
In einigen Fällen anonymisieren wir Informationen, die uns über dich vorliegen, z. B. deine Aktivität auf und außerhalb von unseren Produkten, und nutzen die daraus resultierenden Informationen beispielsweise, um unsere Meta-Produkte, einschließlich Werbeanzeigen, bereitzustellen und zu verbessern.
In unserem Interesse zur Finanzierung unserer Bereitstellung der Meta-Produkte, Bereitstellung relevanter Werbeanzeigen für Nutzer und Verbesserung der Anzeigenauslieferung und Meta-Produkte;
Im Interesse von Werbetreibenden, um ihnen zu helfen, relevante Zielgruppen, die an ihren Informationen, Produkten oder Diensten interessiert sein könnten, zu erreichen;
Im Interesse von Nutzern, damit Meta Datenminimierung und eingebauten Datenschutz in Bezug auf ihre Informationen praktizieren kann
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe von Informationen an andere, einschließlich Strafverfolgungsbehörden, und um auf rechtliche Anfragen zu reagieren.
Informationen darüber, wann wir Informationen an Strafverfolgungsbehörden und andere weitergeben, findest du unter
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, verhindern Schäden und fördern den Schutz und die Sicherheit?
Die Informationskategorien, auf die wir zugreifen, die wir aufbewahren, nutzen und teilen, hängen von den jeweiligen Umständen ab. Beispiel: Bei Reaktionen auf rechtliche Anfragen, zu denen wir gesetzlich nicht verpflichtet sind, sind dies in der Regel eingeschränkte Informationen (wie Kontaktdaten und Login-Informationen).
Die Informationen, die wir verarbeiten, hängen jedoch von den Verarbeitungszwecken ab, zu denen folgende gehören können:
als Reaktion auf
rechtliche Anfragen
von Dritten wie zum Beispiel von Prozessführenden in Zivilprozessen oder von Strafverfolgungs- und anderen Behörden.
um anwendbares Recht einzuhalten oder legitime rechtliche Zwecke zu erfüllen.
um den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Integrität von Meta, Meta-Produkten, Produkten, der Nutzer, der Mitarbeiter, des Eigentums und der Öffentlichkeit zu fördern.
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität fördern.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um Betrug, eine unberechtigte Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen, Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien sowie sonstige schädliche oder illegale Aktivitäten zu verhindern und zu verfolgen; um uns (einschließlich unserer Rechte, des Personals und des Eigentums von Meta bzw. der Meta-Produkte), unsere Nutzer oder andere zu schützen, u. a. im Rahmen von Untersuchungen oder Anfragen von Behörden; oder um den Tod oder eine drohende Körperverletzung zu verhindern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Förderung des Schutzes, der Integrität und der Sicherheit unter bestimmten Umständen außerhalb der Erfüllung unserer Verträge mit dir:
Unsere Meta-Produkte werden bereitgestellt, um den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherzustellen.
Wir führen automatisierte Verarbeitungen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen durch, um Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und sonstige Sicherheitsangelegenheiten sowie negative Erlebnisse anderer Art aufzudecken und zu verhindern, die Integrität unserer Produkte aufrechtzuerhalten und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte zu fördern.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir uns zur Verfügung stehende Informationen, um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verletzungen unserer Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen oder um zu erkennen, wenn jemand Hilfe benötigt.
Mehr dazu erfährst du im
Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich
und in den
Instagram-Sicherheitstipps
.
In unserem Interesse, unsere Plattform und unser Netzwerk zu sichern, Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken, zu verhindern und zu verfolgen, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen von schädlichen oder unangemessenen Inhalten freizuhalten und um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen und diesbezüglich Maßnahmen zu ergreifen; und
Im Interesse unserer Nutzer und der breiten Öffentlichkeit, um negative Erlebnisse zu verhindern und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit zu fördern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe deiner Kontakt-, Profil- oder sonstiger Informationen an Dritte auf Antrag von dir:
Du kannst freiwillig deine Kontakt- und Profilinformationen und andere Daten mit unseren Partnern teilen: Die Arten von Partnern, mit denen die Informationen geteilt werden, hängt davon ab, welche Features unseres Dienstes du nutzt und wie du sie nutzt. Wenn du beispielsweise dein Facebook-Konto mit der App eines Partners verbindest, kannst du freiwillig deine E-Mail-Adresse, deinen Geburtstag, deine Freundesliste, deine Heimatstadt oder andere Informationen mit diesem Partner teilen.
Um Nutzern der Apps unserer Partner hochwertige Erfahrungen zu bieten, entsprechend unserem Interesse und dem Interesse unserer Nutzer.
Um Nutzererlebnisse in den Partner-Apps zu ermöglichen und zu verbessern, entsprechend dem Interesse unserer Partner, die Nutzererfahrungen in ihren Apps ermöglichen und verbessern möchten.
Informationen, die du bereitstellst (beispielsweise E-Mail-Adresse, Geburtstag, Freundesliste und Heimatstadt).
Wenn du ein Gerät benutzt, das wir nicht mit einem registrierten Nutzer der Meta-Produkte verknüpfen können
Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit:
Unsere Meta-Produkte werden in einer Weise bereitgestellt, die den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherstellen soll.
Wir erheben und speichern Informationen, die uns für diesen Zweck zur Verfügung stehen und führen automatisierte Verarbeitungen und manuelle (d. h. menschliche) Überprüfungen durch, um Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und sonstige Sicherheitsangelegenheiten sowie negative Erlebnisse anderer Art aufzudecken und zu verhindern, die Integrität unserer Produkte aufrechtzuerhalten und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte zu untersuchen und zu fördern.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir uns zur Verfügung stehende Informationen, um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verletzungen unserer Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen oder um zu erkennen, wenn jemand Hilfe benötigt.
Mehr dazu erfährst du im
Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich
und in den
Instagram-Sicherheitstipps
.
In unserem Interesse, unsere Plattform und unser Netzwerk zu sichern, Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken, zu verhindern und zu verfolgen, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen von schädlichen oder unangemessenen Inhalten freizuhalten und um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen und diesbezüglich Maßnahmen zu ergreifen; und
Im Interesse unserer Nutzer im Allgemeinen und der breiten Öffentlichkeit, um negative Erlebnisse zu verhindern und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit zu fördern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Bereitstellen von Marketingmitteilungen für dich: Wir erheben und speichern deine Informationen und verwenden sie, um dir Marketingmitteilungen zu senden, wie z. B. eine E-Mail.
In unserem Interesse, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerben und unser Direktmarketing zu versenden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Informationen und Inhalte, die du zur Verfügung stellst, einschließlich deiner Kontaktinformationen wie z. B. deiner E-Mail-Adresse
Forschung und Innovation für soziale Zwecke:
Wir führen Umfragen durch und verwenden Informationen (u. a. von Forschungspartnern, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten), um Forschung und Innovation zu Themen des sozialen Allgemeinwohls, des technologischen Fortschritts, des öffentlichen Interesses, der Gesundheit und des Wohlergehens durchzuführen und zu unterstützen.
Wir erheben, speichern, verknüpfen, analysieren und wenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken wie Aggregation auf Informationen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen im erforderlichen Maß an, um auf diese Weise Forschung zu betreiben und Innovationen für soziale Zwecke zu fördern.
Wir unterstützen die Forschung in Bereichen wie künstliche Intelligenz und maschinelles Lernen.
Erfahre mehr
zu unseren Forschungsprogrammen.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um den Stand der Technik bzw. das wissenschaftliche Verständnis bezüglich wichtiger sozialer Themen zu fördern, die unsere Gesellschaft und Welt positiv beeinflussen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe von Informationen an andere, einschließlich Strafverfolgungsbehörden, und um auf
rechtliche Anfragen
zu reagieren.
Informationen darüber, wann wir Informationen an Strafverfolgungsbehörden und andere weitergeben, findest du unter
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, verhindern Schäden und fördern den Schutz und die Sicherheit?
.
Die Informationskategorien, auf die wir zugreifen, die wir aufbewahren, nutzen und teilen, hängen von den jeweiligen Umständen ab. Beispiel: Bei Reaktionen auf rechtliche Anfragen, zu denen wir gesetzlich nicht verpflichtet sind, sind dies in der Regel eingeschränkte Informationen (wie Kontaktdaten und Login-Informationen).
Die Informationen, die wir verarbeiten, hängen jedoch von den Verarbeitungszwecken ab, zu denen folgende gehören können:
als Reaktion auf
rechtliche Anfragen
von Dritten wie zum Beispiel von Prozessführenden in Zivilprozessen oder von Strafverfolgungs- und anderen Behörden.
um anwendbares Recht einzuhalten oder legitime rechtliche Zwecke zu erfüllen.
um den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Integrität von Meta, Meta-Produkten, Produkten, der Nutzer, der Mitarbeiter, des Eigentums und der Öffentlichkeit zu fördern.
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität fördern.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um Betrug, eine unberechtigte Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen, Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien sowie sonstige schädliche oder illegale Aktivitäten zu verhindern und zu verfolgen; um uns (einschließlich unserer Rechte, des Personals und des Eigentums von Meta bzw. der Meta-Produkte), unsere Nutzer oder andere zu schützen, u. a. im Rahmen von Untersuchungen oder Anfragen von Behörden; oder um den Tod oder eine drohende Körperverletzung zu verhindern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen und zu verbessern:
Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen zu folgenden Zwecken:
Produkte bereitstellen und Features kuratieren
Sehen, ob ein Produkt ordnungsgemäß funktioniert
Nach Fehlern suchen und diese gegebenenfalls beheben
Neue Produkte und Funktionen testen, um deren Funktionalität zu prüfen
Feedback zu unseren Ideen für Produkte oder Funktionen einholen
Durchführung von Umfragen und anderer Forschung dazu, was dir an unseren Produkten und Marken gefällt und was wir noch besser machen können
Um die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen auf einheitliche Weise zu verbessern, um technische Funktionsstörungen zu beheben und um die Funktionalität zu optimieren
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wenn wir deine Informationen verarbeiten, weil dies notwendig ist, um unsere berechtigten Interessen oder die eines Dritten zu verfolgen, hast du das Recht, Widerspruch einzulegen und die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung zu beantragen. Um dein Recht auszuüben, gehe zu den
Facebook-Einstellungen
, zum
Hilfebereich
und zu den Instagram-Einstellungen.
Wir werden verschiedene Faktoren berücksichtigen, wenn wir einen Widerspruch bewerten, wie unter anderem: die angemessenen Erwartungen unserer Nutzer; die Nutzen und Risiken für dich, uns, andere Nutzer oder Dritte; sowie sonstige verfügbare Mittel zur Erreichung desselben Zwecks, die möglicherweise weniger invasiv sind und keinen unverhältnismäßigen Aufwand erfordern. Sofern wir nicht feststellen, dass wir zwingende berechtigte Gründe für diese Verarbeitung haben, die deine Interessen oder Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten überwiegen, oder sofern die Verarbeitung nicht aus rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist, wird deinem Widerspruch stattgegeben und wir werden die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen einstellen. Weitere Informationen zu den Umständen, unter denen ein Widerspruch erfolgreich sein kann, findest du im
Hilfebereich
.
Wenn du in deinem Land minderjährig bist und kein durchsetzbarer Vertrag besteht, werden wir die Tatsache, dass du minderjährig bist, besonders berücksichtigen, wenn wir unsere Bewertung unserer berechtigten Interessen sowie die Abwägung deiner Interessen und Rechte durchführen. Wir stellen Minderjährigen einen besonderen Schutz bereit, um sicherzustellen, dass sie sich der Risiken, Folgen, Schutzmaßnahmen und Rechte bewusst sind, die mit der Verarbeitung ihrer Informationen verbunden sind.
Im öffentlichen Interesse durchgeführte Aufgaben
Die Zwecke, für die wir die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen als Aufgabe im öffentlichen Interesse erwarten, die Verarbeitung, die wir vornehmen, und die Informationen, die wir verwenden, werden nachstehend dargelegt:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Forschung für soziale Zwecke: Wir erheben, speichern, verknüpfen, analysieren und wenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken wie Aggregation auf Informationen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen an, um auf diese Weise Forschung zu betreiben und andere Aufgaben zu erledigen, die im öffentlichen Interesse sind, beispielsweise Teilen relevanter Forschungsdaten mit Dritten wie internationalen Organisationen und Wissenschaftlern innerhalb und außerhalb des EWR. Das öffentliche Interesse muss im Unionsrecht oder im Recht der Mitgliedstaaten oder anderen anwendbaren Gesetzen, denen wir unterliegen, festgelegt sein. In diesem Fall stützen wir uns auf die Artikel 168 und 179 des Vertrags über die Arbeitsweise der Europäischen Union.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Zur Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit: Unter spezifischen tatsächlichen Umständen greifen wir auf deine Daten zu, bewahren sie auf und geben sie an Aufsichtsbehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden oder andere weiter, wenn dies zur Erfüllung einer Aufgabe im öffentlichen Interesse erforderlich ist. So können wir beispielsweise Informationen mit anderen zum Zwecke der Bekämpfung rechtswidrigen oder schädlichen Verhaltens teilen, wenn dies im öffentlichen Interesse liegt und wenn das öffentliche Interesse im Unionsrecht oder im Recht der Mitgliedstaaten oder in anderen anwendbaren Gesetzen, denen wir unterliegen, festgelegt ist. In diesem Fall stützen wir uns auf Section 53 des Data Protection Act 2018 und auf die Verordnung (EU) 2021/1232.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wenn wir deine Informationen so verarbeiten, wie es für die Wahrnehmung einer im öffentlichen Interesse liegenden Aufgabe erforderlich ist, hast du das Recht, unserer Verarbeitung zu widersprechen und ihre Einschränkung zu verlangen. Um deine Rechte auszuüben, gehe zu den
Facebook-Einstellungen
, zum
Hilfebereich
und den Instagram-Einstellungen. Bei der Bewertung eines Widerspruchs werden wir verschiedene Faktoren berücksichtigen, wie unter anderem: die vernünftigen Erwartungen unserer Nutzer; Nutzen und Risiken für dich, uns, andere Nutzer oder Dritte; sowie sonstige verfügbare Mittel zur Erreichung desselben Zwecks, die möglicherweise weniger invasiv sind und keinen unverhältnismäßigen Aufwand erfordern.
Dein Widerspruch wird aufrechterhalten, und wir werden die Verarbeitung deiner Daten einstellen, es sei denn, wir stellen fest, dass wir zwingende berechtigte Gründe für diese Verarbeitung haben, die deine Interessen oder Grundrechte und -freiheiten überwiegen, oder dass die Verarbeitung aus rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Weitere Informationen zu den Umständen, unter denen ein Widerspruch erfolgreich sein kann, findest du im
Hilfebereich
.
Schutz deiner wesentlichen Interessen oder der einer anderen Person
Die verwendeten Informationskategorien, warum wir deine Informationen zum Schutz deiner wesentlichen Interessen oder der lebenswichtigen Interessen einer anderen Person verarbeiten, und wie die Verarbeitung erfolgt, werden im Folgenden aufgeführt.
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Schutz deiner wesentlichen Interessen und/oder der wesentlichen Interessen einer anderen Person: Wir verwenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken, führen manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen durch und geben Informationen in Situationen, in denen die wesentlichen Interessen von jemandem Schutz bedürfen, z. B. in Notfällen, weiter, unter anderem an Strafverfolgungsbehörden und andere. Zu diesen wesentlichen Interessen zählen der Schutz des Lebens, der körperlichen und psychischen Gesundheit, des Wohlbefindens oder der Integrität von dir oder anderen sowie das Erkennen, Entfernen und Melden illegaler Inhalte. Durch den Schutz dieser wesentlichen Interessen möchten wir schädliches Verhalten bekämpfen und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit fördern, beispielsweise wenn wir Meldungen über schädliches Verhalten nachgehen oder geeignete Maßnahmen ergreifen, wie die Weitergabe von Informationen an zuständige Behörden, wenn jemand Hilfe benötigt.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte,
vorbehaltlich des anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Die Verwendung von Cookies durch Facebook in diesem Browser erlauben?
Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um Inhalte in Facebook-Produkten bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, um mithilfe der durch Cookies auf und außerhalb von Facebook empfangenen Informationen die Sicherheit zu verbessern, sowie um Facebook-Produkte für Personen bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, die bereits ein Konto haben.
Weitere Informationen zu erforderlichen und optionalen Cookies
In unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie
erfährst du mehr über Cookies und wie wir sie verwenden. Dort kannst du deine Auswahl außerdem jederzeit überprüfen oder ändern.
Alle Cookies erlauben
Nur erforderliche Cookies erlauben
Die Verwendung von Cookies durch Facebook in diesem Browser erlauben?
Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um Inhalte in Facebook-Produkten bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, um mithilfe der durch Cookies auf und außerhalb von Facebook empfangenen Informationen die Sicherheit zu verbessern, sowie um Facebook-Produkte für Personen bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, die bereits ein Konto haben.
Weitere Informationen zu erforderlichen und optionalen Cookies
In unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie
erfährst du mehr über Cookies und wie wir sie verwenden. Dort kannst du deine Auswahl außerdem jederzeit überprüfen oder ändern.
Alle Cookies erlauben
Nur erforderliche Cookies erlauben
Sub-policy 5
https://www.google.de/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 6
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
LinkedIn respects your privacy
LinkedIn and 3rd parties use essential and non-essential cookies to provide, secure, analyze and improve our Services, and to show you relevant ads (including
professional and job ads
) on and off LinkedIn. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Select Accept to consent or Reject to decline non-essential cookies for this use. You can update your choices at any time in your
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Privacy Policy
Effective September 18, 2024
LinkedIn's global Privacy Policy below applies worldwide. If you're located in the EU, EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you can review additional information that will apply to you in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Your Privacy Matters
LinkedIn’s mission is to connect the world’s professionals to allow them to be more productive and successful. Central to this mission is our commitment to be transparent about the data we collect about you, how it is used and with whom it is shared.
This Privacy Policy applies when you use our Services (described below). We offer our users
choices
about the data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy,
Cookie Policy
, Settings and our
Help Center.
Choices
﻿
Settings
are available to Members of LinkedIn and Visitors are provided separate controls.
Learn More
.
Table of Contents
Data We Collect
How We Use Your Data
How We Share Information
Your Choices and Obligations
Other Important Information
Introduction
We are a social network and online platform for professionals. People use our Services to find and be found for business opportunities, to connect with others and find information. Our Privacy Policy applies to any Member or Visitor to our Services.
Our registered users (“Members”) share their professional identities, engage with their network, exchange knowledge and professional insights, post and view relevant content, learn and develop skills, and find business and career opportunities. Content and data on some of our Services is viewable to non-Members (“Visitors”).
We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to countries in the European Union (EU), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland. Members and Visitors located in the Designated Countries or the UK can review additional information in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Services
This Privacy Policy, including our Cookie Policy applies to your use of our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to LinkedIn.com, LinkedIn-branded apps, and other LinkedIn-branded sites, apps, communications and services offered by LinkedIn (“Services”), including off-site Services, such as our ad services and the “Apply with LinkedIn” and “Share with LinkedIn” plugins, but excluding services that state that they are offered under a different privacy policy. For California residents, additional disclosures required by California law may be found in our
California Privacy Disclosure
.
Data Controllers and Contracting Parties
If you are in the “Designated Countries”, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (“LinkedIn Ireland”) will be the controller of your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
If you are outside of the Designated Countries, LinkedIn Corporation will be the controller of (or business responsible for) your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
As a Visitor or Member of our Services, the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to this Privacy Policy and other documents referenced in this Privacy Policy, as well as updates.
Change
Changes to the Privacy Policy apply to your use of our Services after the “effective date.”
LinkedIn (“we” or “us”) can modify this Privacy Policy, and if we make material changes to it, we will provide notice through our Services, or by other means, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes before they become effective. If you object to any changes, you may
close your account.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our Services after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
1. Data We Collect
1.1 Data You Provide To Us
You provide data to create an account with us.
Registration
To create an account you need to provide data including your name, email address and/or mobile number, general location (e.g., city), and a password. If you register for a premium Service, you will need to provide payment (e.g., credit card) and billing information.
You create your LinkedIn profile (a complete profile helps you get the most from our Services).
Profile
You have
choices
about the information on your profile, such as your education, work experience, skills, photo,
city or area
, endorsements, and optional
verifications
of information on your profile (such as verifications of your identity or workplace). You don’t have to provide additional information on your profile; however, profile information helps you to get more from our Services, including helping recruiters and business opportunities find you. It’s your choice whether to include
sensitive information
on your profile and to make that sensitive information public. Please do not post or add personal data to your profile that you would not want to be publicly available.
You may give other data to us, such as by syncing your calendar.
Posting and Uploading
We collect personal data from you when you provide, post or upload it to our Services, such as when you fill out a form, (e.g., with demographic data or salary), respond to a survey, or submit a resume or fill out a job application on our Services.
If you sync your calendars with our Services, we will collect your calendar meeting information to keep growing your network by suggesting connections for you and others, and by providing information about events, e.g. times, places, attendees and contacts.
You don’t have to post or upload personal data; though if you don’t, it may limit your ability to grow and engage with your network over our Services.
1.2 Data From Others
Others may post or write about you.
Content and News
You and others may post content that includes information about you (as part of articles, posts, comments, videos) on our Services. We also may collect public information about you, such as professional-related news and accomplishments, and make it available as part of our Services, including, as permitted by your settings, in notifications to others of
mentions in the news
.
Others may sync their calendar with our Services
Contact and Calendar Information
We receive personal data (including contact information) about you when others import or sync their calendar with our Services, associate their contacts with Member profiles, scan and upload business cards, or send messages using our Services (including invites or connection requests). If you or others opt-in to sync email accounts with our Services, we will also collect “email header” information that we can associate with Member profiles.
Customers and partners may provide data to us.
Partners
We receive personal data (e.g., your job title and work email address) about you when you use the services of our customers and partners, such as employers or prospective employers and applicant tracking systems providing us job application data.
Related Companies and Other Services
We receive data about you when you use some of the other services provided by us or our
Affiliates
, including Microsoft. For example, you may choose to send us information about your contacts in Microsoft apps and services, such as Outlook, for improved professional networking activities on our Services
1.3 Service Use
We log your visits and use of our Services, including mobile apps.
We log usage data when you visit or otherwise use our Services, including our sites, app and platform technology, such as when you view or click on content (e.g., learning video) or ads (on or off our sites and apps), perform a search, install or update one of our mobile apps, share articles or apply for jobs. We use log-ins, cookies,
device information
and internet protocol (“IP”) addresses to identify you and log your use.
1.4 Cookies and Similar Technologies
We collect data through cookies and similar technologies.
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
, we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g., pixels and ad tags) to collect data (e.g., device IDs) to recognize you and your device(s) on, off and across different services and devices where you have engaged with our Services. We also allow some others to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy. If you are outside the Designated Countries, we also collect (or rely on others who collect) information about your device where you have not engaged with our Services (e.g., ad ID, IP address, operating system and browser information) so we can provide our Members with relevant ads and better understand their effectiveness.
Learn more
. You can
opt out
from our use of data from cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of others for ad targeting and other ad-related purposes. For Visitors,
the controls are
here
.
1.5 Your Device and Location
We receive data through cookies and similar technologies
When you visit or leave our Services (including some plugins and our cookies or similar technology on the sites of others), we receive the URL of both the site you came from and the one you go to and the time of your visit. We also get information about your network and device (e.g., IP address, proxy server, operating system, web browser and add-ons, device identifier and features, cookie IDs and/or ISP, or your mobile carrier). If you use our Services from a mobile device, that device will send us data about your location based on your phone settings. We will ask you to opt-in before we use GPS or other tools to identify your precise location.
1.6 Communications
If you communicate through our Services, we learn about that.
We collect information about you when you communicate with others through our Services (e.g., when you send, receive, or engage with messages, events, or connection requests, including our marketing communications). This may include information that indicates who you are communicating with and when. We also use
automated systems
to support and protect our site. For example, we use such systems to suggest possible responses to messages and to manage or block content that violates our User Agreement or
Professional Community Policies
.
1.7 Workplace and School Provided Information
When your organization (e.g., employer or school) buys a premium Service for you to use, they give us data about you.
Others buying our Services for your use, such as your employer or your school, provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Services that they purchase for use by their workers, students or alumni. For example, we will get contact information for “
LinkedIn Page
” (formerly Company Page) administrators and for authorizing users of our premium Services, such as our recruiting, sales or learning products.
1.8 Sites and Services of Others
We get data when you visit sites that include our ads, cookies or plugins or when you log-in to others’ services with your LinkedIn account.
We receive information about your visits and interaction with services provided by others when you log-in with LinkedIn or visit others’ services that include some of our plugins (such as “Apply with LinkedIn”) or our ads, cookies or similar technologies.
1.9 Other
We are improving our Services, which means we get new data and create new ways to use data.
Our Services are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
Affiliates
Affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by or under common control with us, including, for example, LinkedIn Ireland, LinkedIn Corporation, LinkedIn Singapore and Microsoft Corporation.
2. How We Use Your Data
We use your data to provide, support, personalize and develop our Services.
How we use your personal data will depend on which Services you use, how you use those Services and the choices you make in your
settings
. We may use your personal data to improve, develop, and provide products and Services, develop and train artificial intelligence (AI) models, develop, provide, and personalize our Services, and gain insights with the help of AI, automated systems, and inferences, so that our Services can be more relevant and useful to you and others. You can review LinkedIn's Responsible AI principles
here
and learn more about our approach to generative AI
here
.
Learn more
about the inferences we may make, including as to
your age and gender
and how we use them.
2.1 Services
Our Services help you connect with others, find and be found for work and business opportunities, stay informed, get training and be more productive.
We use your data to authorize access to our Services and honor your settings.
Stay Connected
Our Services allow you to stay in touch and up to date with colleagues, partners, clients, and other professional contacts. To do so, you can “connect” with the professionals who you choose, and who also wish to “connect” with you. Subject to your and their
settings
, when you connect with other Members, you will be able to search each others’ connections in order to exchange professional opportunities.
We use data about you (such as your profile, profiles you have viewed or data provided through address book uploads or partner integrations) to help others find your profile, suggest connections for you and others (e.g. Members who share your contacts or job experiences) and enable you to invite others to become a Member and connect with you. You can also opt-in to allow us to use your precise location or proximity to others for certain tasks (e.g. to suggest other nearby Members for you to connect with, calculate the commute to a new job, or notify your connections that you are at a professional event).
It is your choice whether to invite someone to our Services, send a connection request, or allow another Member to become your connection. When you invite someone to connect with you, your invitation will include your network and basic profile information (e.g., name, profile photo, job title, region). We will send invitation reminders to the person you invited. You can
choose
whether or not to share your own list of connections with your connections.
Visitors have
choices
about how we use their data.
Stay Informed
Our Services allow you to stay informed about news, events and ideas regarding professional topics you care about, and from professionals you respect. Our Services also allow you to improve your professional skills, or learn new ones. We use the data we have about you (e.g., data you provide, data we collect from your engagement with our Services and inferences we make from the data we have about you), to personalize our Services for you, such as by recommending or ranking relevant content and conversations on our Services. We also use the data we have about you to suggest skills you could add to your profile and skills that you might need to pursue your next opportunity. So, if you let us know that you are interested in a new skill (e.g., by watching a learning video), we will use this information to personalize content in your feed, suggest that you follow certain Members on our site, or suggest related learning content to help you towards that new skill. We use your content, activity and other data, including your name and photo, to provide notices to your network and others. For example, subject to your
settings
, we may notify others that you have updated your profile, posted content, took a
social action
, used a feature, made new connections or were
mentioned in the news
.
Career
Our Services allow you to explore careers, evaluate educational opportunities, and seek out, and be found for, career opportunities. Your profile can be found by those looking to hire (for a job or a
specific task
) or be hired by you. We will use your data to recommend jobs and show you and others relevant professional contacts (e.g., who work at a company, in an industry, function or location or have certain skills and connections). You can signal that you are
interested
in changing jobs and share information with recruiters. We will use your data to recommend jobs to you and you to recruiters. We may use automated systems to provide content and recommendations to help make our Services more relevant to our Members, Visitors and customers. Keeping your profile accurate and up-to-date may help you better connect to others and to opportunities through our Services.
Productivity
Our Services allow you to collaborate with colleagues, search for potential clients, customers, partners and others to do business with. Our Services allow you to communicate with other Members and schedule and prepare meetings with them. If your
settings
allow, we scan messages to provide “bots” or similar tools that facilitate tasks such as scheduling meetings, drafting responses, summarizing messages or recommending next steps.
Learn more
.
2.2 Premium Services
Our premium Services help paying users to search for and contact Members through our Services, such as searching for and contacting job candidates, sales leads and co-workers, manage talent and promote content.
We sell premium Services that provide our customers and subscribers with customized-search functionality and tools (including messaging and activity alerts) as part of our talent, marketing and sales solutions. Customers can export limited information from your profile, such as name, headline, current company, current title, and general location (e.g., Dublin), such as to manage sales leads or talent, unless you
opt-out
. We do not provide contact information to customers as part of these premium Services without your consent. Premium Services customers can store information they have about you in our premium Services, such as a resume or contact information or sales history. The data stored about you by these customers is subject to the policies of those customers. Other enterprise Services and features that use your data include
TeamLink
and
LinkedIn Pages
(e.g., content analytics and followers).
2.3 Communications
We contact you and enable communications between Members. We offer settings to control what messages you receive and how often you receive some types of messages.
We will contact you through email, mobile phone, notices posted on our websites or apps, messages to your LinkedIn inbox, and other ways through our Services, including text messages and push notifications. We will send you messages about the availability of our Services, security, or other service-related issues. We also send messages about how to use our Services, network updates, reminders, job suggestions and promotional messages from us and our partners. You may change your communication
preferences
at any time. Please be aware that you cannot opt out of receiving service messages from us, including security and legal notices.
We also enable
communications
between you and others through our Services, including for example
invitations
,
InMail
,
groups
and
messages
between connections.
2.4 Advertising
We serve you tailored ads both on and off our Services. We offer you choices regarding personalized ads, but you cannot opt-out of seeing non-personalized ads.
We target (and measure the performance of) ads to Members, Visitors and others both on and off our Services directly or through a variety of partners, using the following data, whether separately or combined:
Data collected by advertising technologies on and off our Services using pixels, ad tags (e.g., when an advertiser installs a LinkedIn
tag
on their website), cookies, and other device identifiers;
Member-provided information (e.g., profile, contact information, title and industry);
Data from your use of our Services (e.g., search history, feed, content you read, who you follow or is following you, connections,
groups
participation, page visits, videos you watch, clicking on an ad, etc.), including as described in Section 1.3;
Information from advertising
partners
, vendors and
publishers
; and
Information inferred from data described above (e.g., using job titles from a profile to infer industry, seniority, and compensation bracket; using graduation dates to infer age or using first names or pronoun usage to infer gender; using your feed activity to infer your interests; or using device data to recognize you as a Member).
Learn more
about the inferences we make and how they may be used for advertising.
Learn more
about the ad technologies we use and our advertising services and partners. You can learn more about our compliance with laws in the Designated Countries or the UK in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
We will show you ads called
sponsored content
which look similar to non-sponsored content, except that they are labeled as advertising (e.g., as “ad” or “sponsored”). If you take a social action (such as like, comment or share) on these ads, your action is associated with your name and viewable by others, including the advertiser. Subject to your
settings
, if you take a social action on the LinkedIn Services, that action may be mentioned with related ads. For example, when you like a company we may include your name and photo when their sponsored content is shown.
Ad Choices
You have choices regarding our uses of certain categories of data to show you more relevant ads. Member settings
can be found here
. For Visitors,
the setting is here
.
Info to Ad Providers
We do not share your personal data with any third-party advertisers or ad networks except for: (i) hashed IDs or device identifiers (to the extent they are personal data in some countries); (ii) with your separate permission (e.g., in a lead generation form) or (iii) data already visible to any users of the Services (e.g., profile). However, if you view or click on an ad on or off our Services, the ad provider will get a signal that someone visited the page that displayed the ad, and they may, through the use of mechanisms such as cookies, determine it is you. Advertising partners can associate personal data collected by the advertiser directly from you with hashed IDs or device identifiers received from us. We seek to contractually require such advertising partners to obtain your explicit, opt-in consent before doing so where legally required, and in such instances, we take steps to ensure that consent has been provided before processing data from them.
2.5 Marketing
We promote our Services to you and others.
In addition to advertising our Services, we use Members’ data and content for invitations and communications promoting membership and network growth, engagement and our Services, such as by showing your connections that you have used a feature on our Services.
2.6 Developing Services and Research
We develop our Services and conduct research
Service Development
We use data, including public feedback, to conduct
research
and development for our Services in order to provide you and others with a better, more intuitive and personalized experience, drive membership growth and engagement on our Services, and help connect professionals to each other and to economic opportunity.
Other Research
We seek to create economic opportunity for Members of the global workforce and to help them be more productive and successful. We use the personal data available to us to research social, economic and workplace trends, such as jobs availability and skills needed for these
jobs
and policies that help bridge the gap in various industries and geographic areas. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under
controls
that are designed to protect your privacy. We may also make public data available to
researchers
to enable assessment of the safety and legal compliance of our Services. We publish or allow others to publish economic insights, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
Surveys
Polls and surveys are conducted by us and others through our Services. You are not obligated to respond to polls or surveys, and you have choices about the information you provide. You may
opt-out
of survey invitations.
2.7 Customer Support
We use data to help you and fix problems.
We use data (which can include your communications) to investigate, respond to and resolve complaints and for Service issues (e.g., bugs).
2.8 Insights That Do Not Identify You
We use data to generate insights that do not identify you.
We use your
data
to perform analytics to produce and share insights that do not identify you. For example, we may use your data to generate statistics about our Members, their profession or industry, to calculate ad impressions served or clicked on (e.g., for basic business reporting to support billing and budget management or, subject to your
settings
, for reports to advertisers who may use them to inform their advertising campaigns), to show Members' information about engagement with a
post
or LinkedIn
Page
, to publish visitor demographics for a Service or create demographic workforce insights, or to understand usage of our services.
2.9 Security and Investigations
We use data for security, fraud prevention and investigations.
We and our Affiliates, including Microsoft, may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of the law, our
User Agreement
and/or attempts to harm our Members, Visitors, company, Affiliates, or others.
Social Action
E.g. like, comment, follow, share
Partners
Partners include ad networks, exchanges and others
3. How We Share Information
3.1 Our Services
Any data that you include on your profile and any content you post or social action (e.g., likes, follows, comments, shares) you take on our Services will be seen by others, consistent with your settings.
Profile
Your profile is fully visible to all Members and customers of our Services. Subject to your
settings
, it can also be visible to others on or off of our Services (e.g., Visitors to our Services or users of third-party search tools). As detailed in our
Help Center
, your settings, degree of connection with the viewing Member, the subscriptions they may have, their
usage of our Services
, access channels and search types (e.g., by name or by keyword) impact the availability of your profile and whether they can view certain fields in your profile.
Posts, Likes, Follows, Comments, Messages
Our Services allow viewing and sharing information including through posts, likes, follows and comments.
When you share an article or a post (e.g., an update, image, video or article) publicly it can be viewed by everyone and re-shared anywhere (subject to your
settings
). Members, Visitors and others will be able to find and see your publicly-shared content, including your name (and photo if you have provided one).
In a
group
, posts are visible to others according to group type. For example, posts in private groups are visible to others in the group and posts in public groups are visible publicly. Your membership in groups is public and part of your profile, but you can change visibility in your
settings
.
Any information you share through companies’ or other organizations’ pages on our Services will be viewable by those organizations and others who view those pages' content.
When you follow a person or organization, you are visible to others and that “page owner” as a follower.
We let senders know when you act on their message, subject to your
settings
where applicable.
Subject to your
settings
, we let a Member know when you view their profile. We also give you
choices
about letting organizations know when you've viewed their Page.
When you like or re-share or comment on another’s content (including ads), others will be able to view these “social actions” and associate it with you (e.g., your name, profile and photo if you provided it).
Your employer can see how you use Services they provided for your work (e.g. as a recruiter or sales agent) and related information. We will not show them your job searches or personal messages.
Enterprise Accounts
Your employer may offer you access to our enterprise Services such as Recruiter, Sales Navigator, LinkedIn Learning or our advertising Campaign Manager. Your employer can review and manage your use of such enterprise Services.
Depending on the enterprise Service, before you use such Service, we will ask for permission to share with your employer relevant data from your profile or use of our non-enterprise Services. For example, users of Sales Navigator will be asked to share their “social selling index”, a score calculated in part based on their personal account activity. We understand that certain activities such as job hunting and personal messages are sensitive, and so we do not share those with your employer unless you choose to share it with them through our Services (for example, by applying for a new position in the same company or mentioning your job hunting in a message to a co-worker through our Services).
Subject to your
settings
, when you use workplace tools and services (e.g., interactive employee directory tools) certain of your data may also be made available to your employer or be connected with information we receive from your employer to enable these tools and services.
3.2 Communication Archival
Regulated Members may need to store communications outside of our Service.
Some Members (or their employers) need, for legal or professional compliance, to archive their communications and social media activity, and will use services of others to provide these archival services. We enable archiving of messages by and to those Members outside of our Services. For example, a financial advisor needs to archive communications with her clients through our Services in order to maintain her professional financial advisor license.
3.3 Others’ Services
You may link your account with others’ services so that they can look up your contacts’ profiles, post your shares on such platforms, or enable you to start conversations with your connections on such platforms. Excerpts from your profile will also appear on the services of others.
Subject to your
settings
, other services may look up your profile. When you opt to link your account with other services, personal data (e.g., your name, title, and company) will become available to them. The sharing and use of that personal data will be described in, or linked to, a consent screen when you opt to link the accounts. For example, you may link your Twitter or WeChat account to share content from our Services into these other services, or your email provider may give you the option to upload your LinkedIn contacts into its own service. Third-party services have their own privacy policies, and you may be giving them permission to use your data in ways we would not. You may
revoke
the link with such accounts.
The information you make available to others in our Services (e.g., information from your profile, your posts, your engagement with the posts, or message to Pages)
may be available to them on other services
. For example, search tools, mail and calendar applications, or talent and lead managers may show a user limited profile data (subject to your
settings
), and social media management tools or other platforms may display your posts. The information retained on these services may not reflect updates you make on LinkedIn.
3.4 Related Services
We share your data across our different Services and LinkedIn affiliated entities.
We will share your personal data with our Affiliates to provide and develop our Services. For example, we may refer a query to Bing in some instances, such as where you'd benefit from a more up to date response in a chat experience. In regions outside the Designated Countries, we may also share your publicly-shared content (such as your public LinkedIn posts) with our Affiliates, including Microsoft, to provide or develop their services.
Where allowed
, we may combine information internally across the different Services covered by this Privacy Policy to help our Services be more relevant and useful to you and others. For example, we may personalize your feed or job recommendations based on your learning history.
3.5 Service Providers
We may use others to help us with our Services.
We use others to help us provide our Services (e.g., maintenance, analysis, audit, payments, fraud detection, customer support, marketing and development). They will have access to your information (e.g., the contents of a customer support request) as reasonably necessary to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for other purposes. If you purchase a Service from us, we may use a payments service provider who may separately collect information about you (e.g., for fraud prevention or to comply with legal obligations).
3.6 Legal Disclosures
We may need to share your data when we believe it’s required by law or to help protect the rights and safety of you, us or others.
It is possible that we will need to disclose information about you when required by law, subpoena, or other legal process or if we have a good faith belief that disclosure is reasonably necessary to (1) investigate, prevent or take action regarding suspected or actual illegal activities or to assist government enforcement agencies; (2) enforce our agreements with you; (3) investigate and defend ourselves against any third-party claims or allegations; (4) protect the security or integrity of our Services or the products or services of our Affiliates (such as by sharing with companies facing similar threats); or (5) exercise or protect the rights and safety of LinkedIn, our Members, personnel or others. We attempt to notify Members about legal demands for their personal data when appropriate in our judgment, unless prohibited by law or court order or when the request is an emergency. We may dispute such demands when we believe, in our discretion, that the requests are overbroad, vague or lack proper authority, but we do not promise to challenge every demand. To learn more see our
Data Request Guidelines
and
Transparency Report
.
3.7 Change in Control or Sale
We may share your data when our business is sold to others, but it must continue to be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We can also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity which buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy unless you agree otherwise.
4. Your Choices & Obligations
4.1 Data Retention
We keep most of your personal data for as long as your account is open.
We generally retain your personal data as long as you keep your account open or as needed to provide you Services. This includes data you or others provided to us and data generated or inferred from your use of our Services. Even if you only use our Services when looking for a new job every few years, we will retain your information and keep your profile open, unless you close your account. In some cases we choose to retain certain information (e.g., insights about Services use) in a depersonalized or aggregated form.
4.2 Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
You can access or delete your personal data. You have many choices about how your data is collected, used and shared.
We provide many
choices
about the collection, use and sharing of your data, from deleting or correcting data you include in your
profile
and controlling the visibility of your
posts
to advertising
opt-outs
and
communication
controls. We offer you
settings
to control and manage the personal data we have about you.
For personal data that we have about you, you can:
Delete Data
: You can ask us to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Change or Correct Data
: You can edit some of your personal data through your account. You can also ask us to change, update or fix your data in certain cases, particularly if it’s inaccurate.
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data
: You can ask us to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if we have no legal right to keep using it) or to limit our use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Right to Access and/or Take Your Data
: You can ask us for a copy of your personal data and can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in machine readable form.
Visitors can
learn more about how to make these requests here
. You may also contact us using the contact information below, and we will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
Residents in the
Designated Countries and the UK
, and
other regions
, may have additional rights under their laws.
4.3 Account Closure
We keep some of your data even after you close your account.
If you choose to close your
LinkedIn
account, your personal data will generally stop being visible to others on our Services within 24 hours. We generally delete closed account information within 30 days of account closure, except as noted below.
We retain your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse (e.g., if we have
restricted
your account for breach of our
Professional Community Policies
), enforce our User Agreement, or fulfill your request to "unsubscribe" from further messages from us. We will retain de-personalized information after your account has been closed.
Information you have shared with others (e.g., through InMail, updates or group posts) will remain visible after you close your account or delete the information from your own profile or mailbox, and we do not control data that other Members have copied out of our Services. Groups content and ratings or review content associated with closed accounts will show an unknown user as the source. Your profile may continue to be displayed in the services of others (e.g., search tools) until they refresh their cache.
5. Other Important Information
5.1. Security
We monitor for and try to prevent security breaches. Please use the security features available through our Services.
We implement security safeguards designed to protect your data, such as HTTPS. We regularly monitor our systems for possible vulnerabilities and attacks. However, we cannot warrant the security of any information that you send us. There is no guarantee that data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Please visit our
Safety Center
for additional information about safely using our Services, including
two-factor authentication
.
5.2. Cross-Border Data Transfers
We store and use your data outside your country.
We process data both inside and outside of the United States and rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer data across borders.
Learn more
. Countries where we process data may have laws which are different from, and potentially not as protective as, the laws of your own country.
5.3 Lawful Bases for Processing
We have lawful bases to collect, use and share data about you. You have choices about our use of your data. At any time, you can withdraw consent you have provided by going to settings.
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g., to deliver the LinkedIn Services you have requested) and “legitimate interests.”
Learn more
.
Where we rely on your
consent
to process personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline your consent at any time and where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.
Learn More
. If you have any questions about the lawful bases upon which we collect and use your personal data, please
contact our Data Protection Officer here
.
If you're located in one of the Designated Countries or the UK, you can learn more about our lawful bases for processing in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
5.4. Direct Marketing and Do Not Track Signals
Our statements regarding direct marketing and “do not track” signals.
We currently do not share personal data with third parties for their direct marketing purposes without your permission.
Learn more
about this and about our response to “do not track” signals.
5.5. Contact Information
You can contact us or use other options to resolve any complaints.
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Policy, please first
contact LinkedIn
online. You can also reach us by
physical mail
. If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you have more
options
. Residents in the
Designated Countries
and
other regions
may also have the right to
contact our Data Protection Officer here
or at
DPO@linkedin.com
. If this does not resolve your complaint, Residents in the Designated Countries and other regions may have more
options
under their laws.
Consent
Where we process data based on consent, we will ask for your explicit consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal. Where we rely on contract, we will ask that you agree to the processing of personal data that is necessary for entering into or performance of your contract with us. We will rely on legitimate interests as a basis for data processing where the processing of your data is not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Sub-policy 7
https://www.privacyshield.gov/EU-US-Framework:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 8
https://vimeo.com/privacy:
Solutions
Video marketing
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Event marketing
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Employee communication
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Video monetization
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Create
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Manage
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Grow
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
DEMO VIDEOS
Get to know everything Vimeo can do for your business.
Watch now
Resources
Learn
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Connect
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Best of the Year
Browse Videos
Staff Picks
Categories
Channels
On Demand
Pricing
Contact Sales
Log in
Join
Help
Pricing
Log in
Join
Settings
Language
Mature content filter
Watch
More
Vimeo OTT
On Demand
Stock
Vimeo Experts
For Hire
Referrals
Legal
Terms
Privacy
U.S. State Privacy
Copyright
Cookies
Log in
Join
Login
Solutions
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
Resources
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Pricing
Contact Sales
Search
Search
Upload
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Copyright
Cookies
Desktop site
Language
English
Español
Deutsch
Français
日本語
Português
한국어
FAQ
Help
TM + © 2025 Vimeo.com, Inc.
Vimeo Privacy Policy
Last Updated: March 11, 2025
This Privacy Policy explains the information that Vimeo collects when you use our products and services or otherwise interact with us, how that information is used, with whom it may be shared, and your privacy choices.
Introduction
Children's Privacy
Data We Collect About You
How We Use Your Data
With Whom We Share Your Data
Legal and Safety-Related Disclosures
Data Retention
Account and Video Privacy Settings
Communications from Us
Protecting Your Information
Your Responsibilities
Third-Party Services
Location of Data and Data Processing
Your Privacy Rights
﻿How to Contact Us
1. Introduction
Who we are and what we do
This Privacy Policy covers Vimeo.com, Inc. (collectively, “
Vimeo
,” “
we
,” “
us
,” or “
our
”). We provide online video hosting, sharing and related services through our owned-and-operated websites, including Vimeo.com and Livestream.com, our branded applications for mobile and connected devices, and our embeddable video players (collectively, the “
services
”).
Acceptance and Changes
By registering for, downloading, or using our services, you accept this Privacy Policy, which is part of our
Terms of Service
. We may modify this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will post any modified version of our Privacy Policy at
https://vimeo.com/privacy
. If we change the Privacy Policy in a way that materially lessens our commitments to you, we will provide notice to registered users by email or other methods.
2. Children's Privacy
We do not knowingly collect personal information from individuals who are under the minimum required ages specified herein. You must be at least 16 years old or the age of majority in your jurisdiction, whichever is greater, to use our services. Individuals under the applicable age may use our services only through a parent or legal guardian's account and with their involvement. If you are a parent or legal guardian who believes your child has provided personal information to Vimeo without your consent, you may ask us to delete such information by contacting us at
privacy@vimeo.com
.
3. Data We Collect About You
We collect information about you when you use our services. In addition, third parties may collect information about you when you use our services. Collected information may include or reflect personal information that could identify you, as well as non-personal information. We refer to your information as
"your data"
for short.
Account Information
To create an account, you must provide a valid email address and password. If you choose to sign-up and/or authenticate using a third-party account (e.g., Facebook, Google), you authorize us to obtain account information from the third-party platform.
Financial Information
To make a purchase, you may need to provide a valid payment method (e.g., credit card or PayPal account) and billing address. Your payment information will be collected and processed by our authorized payment vendors. We do not directly collect or store credit or debit card numbers ourselves in the ordinary course of processing transactions. If we allow purchase through a third-party platform (i.e. in-app purchase), the payment method stored with the third-party platform will be charged. If you choose to make a purchase via bank transfer, you must provide the relevant bank account details.
If you offer content for sale using our services, you must provide an account to receive funds and tax information, which may include your name, address, and taxpayer identification number. In some jurisdictions, you may also be required to verify your identity with our third-party provider, which involves providing a government-issued identification, your physical address, phone number, and email address.
Content You Submit
You may upload and create content such as videos, text, photographs, and artwork. Your account profile may display information about you and your activities. This information may be accessed by others. Your videos may be viewed and otherwise accessed by others, and associated metadata (e.g., titles, closed captions, descriptions, tags, etc.) may be viewable by others. You may choose to limit the availability of your profile and videos. For more details, see
Section 8
.
Your interactions during events such as live streams and webinars, or with other users (e.g., comments, "likes," poll responses) may be seen by others.
If you use Vimeo AI to translate the audio track of your video, we collect data about your voice in order to provide those services.
Registration Forms
You may submit information through a registration form set up by a video owner or event host. This information will be received by both Vimeo and the video owner and is subject to both Vimeo's Privacy Policy as well as the video owner's privacy policy. Except where Vimeo is the video owner, Vimeo will not use any information you submit through such forms for direct marketing purposes.
Other Information You May Submit
You may submit data to us for limited purposes, such as requesting customer support; participating in a study or survey; entering contests or sweepstakes; applying for a job; or signing up to receive communications from us or another user.
Automatically Collected Information
We automatically collect certain types of data when you use our services, regardless of whether you have an account. This data includes your IP address, rough geolocation derived from IP address, technical information about your device (e.g., browser type, operating system, basic device information), the web page you visited or search query you entered before reaching us, and your activities. We may track your activities using cookies and similar technologies. By using our services, you agree to our use of these methods as set forth in our
Cookie Policy
.
Information Collected by Third Parties
Some third parties may collect data about you when you use our services. This may include data you submit (such as payment information) or automatically collected information (in the case of third-party analytics providers and advertising partners).
We may obtain data from third parties about you. We may combine that data with information that we have collected. For example, some advertisers or advertising platforms may allow us to determine what other online services you might use so that we may place relevant ads on those services.
4. How We Use Your Data
We may use your data for the following purposes:
Identification and authentication:
We use your data to authenticate you as the owner of your account when you interact with customer support. We may also use your data to verify your identity if you offer content for sale using our services.
Operating our services:
We use your data to provide our services, process and fulfill orders, provide customer support, and to otherwise comply with our contractual obligations to you. We (and/or our third-party vendors) use your financial information to process purchases made by you and to pay you amounts you have earned.
Communicating with you:
We use your data when we communicate with you (e.g., when we respond to a customer support or other inquiry).
Improving our services:
We use your data to understand how our services are being used and how we can improve them.
Customizing your experience:
We use your data to personalize the service to you. This may include remembering your preferences for language or volume or displaying videos that you might enjoy, based upon your viewing choices. This may also include restricting access to certain features or content due to applicable law in your location.
Marketing and advertising:
We use your data to show you ads on third-party sites, and to measure the effectiveness of those ads. We may also use your data to contact you about products, services, or resources that might interest you.
Protecting our services:
We use your data to secure our platform, prevent abuse of our services, and enforce our Terms of Service. For example, we use tools that process data to detect and prevent fraud in transactions and content that violates our Acceptable Use Policy.
Legal compliance:
We use your data where we are legally required to do so. For example, we may need to gather your data to respond to a subpoena or court order.
Protecting your information:
Where appropriate, we may anonymize, backup, and delete certain data.
We may use algorithms, machine learning, and other automated means to implement any of the above.
Whenever we process your data for one of these purposes, we have determined that one or more of the following lawful bases apply:
Performance of a contract;
Legitimate commercial interest;
Compliance with a legal obligation; or
Consent
When Vimeo relies on legitimate interest as a lawful basis of processing, we undertake a balancing test to ensure that the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject are not outweighed by Vimeo’s interest.
5. With Whom We Share Your Data
We share data with third parties as follows:
As you instruct:
We may make your profile and videos available to others as you instruct in using our services. We may share your data with persons to whom you have granted account-level access.
With your consent:
We may share your data with third parties where we have obtained your express consent to do so.
Authorized vendors:
We may share your data with third-party vendors that help us operate and improve our services, process orders, and comply with your instructions and our contractual obligations. This includes payment processors, content delivery networks (CDNs), cloud-based hosting services, monitoring services, email service providers, quality assurance and testing vendors, fraud and abuse prevention vendors, customer relations management (CRM) vendors, chatbot providers, and shipment vendors.
Advertising:
We may share your data with advertising companies to display relevant ads to you, and to measure the effectiveness of those ads.
Analytics:
We may share your data with analytics providers which help us understand how customers are using our services. We may also share individually identifying analytics information with the hosts of live events you attend, the owners of recorded video you view (where you have provided your consent to share such information), and the administrator(s) of your Enterprise Account (see below for more details).
Affiliates and advisors:
We may share your data with our auditors and advisors for planning, financial reporting, accounting, auditing, tax filings, and legal compliance. We may share your data with our affiliates to the extent necessary to provide you with the services ordered.
Certain legal situations:
We may share your data where we believe disclosure is necessary to comply with a legal obligation or in connection with a corporate transaction as discussed in
Section 6
.
Aggregated or anonymized information:
We may publicly disclose non-personal aggregated or anonymized information such as our number of visitors and registered users.
We use reasonable efforts to vet vendors for their privacy and data security practices. We require that all vendors agree to protect the data we share.
Enterprise Accounts
If you create a Vimeo account using an email address provided or assigned to you by an organization (such as your work email address):
Vimeo may share your personal information (e.g., name, email address) with such organization; and
The organization may establish a direct relationship with us and migrate your data to the organization's account (an "
Enterprise Account
").
When you use an Enterprise Account, the administrators of the Enterprise Account may:
Access information about your Enterprise Account activity, including your video viewing history;
Manage and change the content within your account, including profile information;
Control your ability to view, edit, or delete content; and
Delete your account.
The organizational owner of the Enterprise Account, not Vimeo, is responsible for the accounts it controls and its use of its account users' data. Your use of our services is subject to such organization’s privacy policies, which may differ from Vimeo’s. If you do not want an organization to access or otherwise control your account, use a personal email address and do not use an organizational email address when creating an account. If your account has not yet joined an Enterprise Account, you may update your email address in your account settings to prevent automatically joining in the future.
6. Legal and Safety-Related Disclosures
We may disclose your data in response to official requests (e.g., court orders, subpoenas, search warrants, national security requests, etc.) ("
requests
") that we receive from government authorities or parties to legal proceedings. We direct law enforcement agencies to our
Law Enforcement Guidelines
page.
We handle U.S. requests in accordance with U.S. law. If the request originates from a foreign jurisdiction, we will typically disclose information where we in good faith believe that disclosure is permitted by both U.S. law and local law. In all cases, we may raise or waive any legal objection or right available to us, in our sole discretion.
We may disclose user data where we reasonably believe that someone's life is at risk. For example, if we become aware of a person threatening to commit suicide, we may share that person's data with appropriate entities that may have the ability to help.
We may disclose user data to report suspected crimes. We report content suspected of exploiting minors to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC) along with the data identifying the uploading user.
We may disclose user data in situations involving legal claims against us or one of our users. If you submit a
Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA)
or other takedown notice, we may share that notice with the affected user. If you challenge such a notice, we may share your response with the complainant.
We may share your data with potential transaction partners, advisors, and others in the event our company is, in whole or part, acquired by a third party. In such case, we will use reasonable efforts to require the acquiring entity to comply with this Privacy Policy.
7. Data Retention
We retain your data for as long as you have an account. When you close an account, we will delete your data. We may retain logs of automatically collected information (for internal analytics and security purposes); your email address; your tax information; communications with you; and your transactional information (for auditing, tax, and financial purposes). When we no longer have a business reason for retaining your data, we will delete or anonymize it.
We retain deleted videos on our servers for a short period in case you wish to reverse deletion. Once we delete a video, we may not be able to recover it. If you have previously made a video public, the video or its thumbnail may continue to be discoverable in a search engine's cache for a time.
If we receive legal process pertaining to your account, we will retain your data for as long as we in good faith believe is necessary to comply with the legal process. Similarly, if we believe that your account has been involved in wrongdoing, we may preserve your data to defend or assert our rights.
8. Account and Video Privacy Settings
As part of our services, we offer you the ability to limit the distribution of your content, including your videos. This section explains some of your choices.
Profile
Some of our online subscription plans enable you to "hide" your profile or otherwise make it inaccessible on our website. Your profile will, however, remain accessible to persons who have access to your account or content.
Team Members
Some of our subscription plans enable you to grant account-level access rights to others. Persons with such access ("
Team Members
") may be able to see and potentially alter your data. You may revoke or downgrade Team Member access at any time.
Videos
We enable you to manage the privacy settings of your videos.
Learn more
about available privacy settings. You may change a video's privacy settings at any time. Changes will be applied on a go-forward basis.
You may create a sharable link to your video for the purpose of sharing your video with others or embedding your video on a third-party website (including your own). Creating such a sharable link will override your privacy settings and will allow anyone who enters the link in a browser to view your video without restriction. Similarly, embedding your video on a publicly available website will allow the public to view your video regardless of your privacy settings.
You should exercise caution in granting access to others (whether through link sharing or passwords). Once you have granted access to someone else, you lose a degree of control over the distribution of your video as those persons may share the password and/or link with other people.
Regardless of your profile or video privacy settings, Vimeo reserves the right to inspect them for compliance with its
Terms of Service
, to provide customer support, or to address technical issues.
9. Communications from Us
Emails
If you create an account or request information about Vimeo's services, you may receive commercial emails from us. You may always opt out from receiving commercial messages in your account settings or through the unsubscribe link included at the bottom of each email. Please note that any opt-out request may take several days to process and you will continue to receive transactional emails from us (e.g., emails confirming transactions and/or providing information about your account).
Mobile Device Communications
We may, with your consent, send push notifications in our apps. You may disable these by declining them or changing the app's settings. To the extent provided, we may, with your consent, send SMS messages to your mobile telephone for authentication and security purposes. You may opt out of receiving such messages at any time.
10. Protecting Your Information
We use physical, technical, and organizational security measures to safeguard your data from unauthorized or accidental disclosure. Despite these efforts, no information system can be 100% secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Users also have a role to play in keeping their data safe. We encourage you to use a unique and hard-to-guess password for your account and to not share it with others. You should only grant access rights to people who you know and trust, and, even then, you should be careful in granting all access rights. You should monitor your account regularly. If you believe that someone has gained access to your account without your permission, please contact us immediately so that we can investigate.
11. Your Responsibilities
You may receive other people's data in using our service. If you receive information from other users, you must process that information in compliance with your published privacy policy and all applicable laws, including those concerning privacy, data security, and online marketing.
12. Third-Party Services
We may provide access to online services that we do not own or operate via hyperlinks or integrations. These services fall outside of this Privacy Policy and we have no control over the data they collect. Once on a third-party site, your data may be collected by others. We encourage you to read our
Third-Part
y Service Addendum
and the privacy policies of such services before using them.
You may use our service through third-party sites. For example, you may watch a video that is embedded on a third-party site or use one of our apps on a third-party platform. This Privacy Policy covers our apps and video players, but does not cover any third-party site or any third-party video player.
13. Location of Data and Data Processing
Vimeo is based in the United States. We provide services globally using computer systems, servers, and databases located in the U.S. and other countries. When you use our services from outside of the U.S., your information may be transferred to and processed in the U.S. In accordance with applicable international data protection laws, we may transfer your personal information from your home country to the U.S. (or other countries) based upon the following legal bases:
Legitimate business interests: We could not provide our services or comply with our legal obligations without transferring your personal information to the U.S.
Our use of Standard Contractual Clauses (also known as "Model Clauses") where appropriate.
The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Vimeo complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, respectively. Vimeo has certified that it adheres to the DPF Principles. The following Vimeo subsidiaries also adhere to the DPF Principles: Livestream LLC and VideoJi, Inc. Vimeo remains responsible for any of your personal information that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for external processing on our behalf. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the DPF program, and to view our certification, visit the
DPF website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF certification, we encourage you to contact us at the address listed in
Section 15
. Vimeo is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the DPF Principles
. You may contact
JAMS
, our U.S.-based alternative dispute resolution provider, for more information or to file a complaint, at no cost to you.
14. Your Privacy Rights
We enable you to make numerous choices about your data:
You may choose not to provide us with certain information. For example, you may choose not to create an account or not to provide optional account information.
You may change your account and video privacy settings. See
Section 8
for more details.
You may change or correct information voluntarily submitted to us. We encourage you to keep your data current by viewing your settings page.
You may opt out of receiving commercial emails from us. See
Section 9
for more details.
You may limit the use of cookies. See
our
Cookie Policy
for options.
You may close your account (which will delete all videos) or delete certain videos.
In addition, depending on where you reside, you may have certain privacy rights. These may include the right to: access, correct, delete, erase, restrict, or object to our use of your personal information; port your data; and withdraw consents. We enable exercise of these rights primarily through our services (which we reserve the right to modify). For example, we allow users to change their information, download their videos, and close their accounts. We also fulfill our obligations in response to direct requests. We will endeavor to process requests within one month. Please note that we may not be able to comply with requests to the extent that they would cause us to violate any law or infringe any other person's rights. We reserve the right to request appropriate identification. We will process requests free of charge unless they would impose an unreasonable cost on us.
Additional details about Vimeo’s data collection, use, and third-party disclosures can be found in our
U.S. State Privacy Notice
.
15. How to Contact Us
For any questions, inquiries, or complaints relating to your privacy, please contact us at:
Vimeo.com, Inc.
Attention: Data Protection Officer
330 West 34th Street, 10th Floor
New York, New York 10001
privacy@vimeo.com
Alternatively, if you are in the EU, EEA, or Switzerland and would like to exercise your rights or have questions about our processing of personal information, you may contact our local representative.
For the EU/EEA:
European Data Protection Office via the online request form at
https://edpo.com/gdpr-data-request
or by writing to EDPO at Avenue Huart Hamoir 71, 1030 Brussels, Belgium.
For Switzerland:
EDPO Switzerland Sàrl via the online request form at
https://edpo.com/swiss-data-request
or by writing to EDPO Switzerland at Rue de Lausanne 37, 1201 Geneva, Switzerland.